THE  PROPOSED  REORGANIZATION  OF  THE 
DEPARTMENT  OF  HOMELAND  SECURITY 

S.  HRG.  109–1125 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

JULY  19,  2005 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

65–180 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2011 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on July 19, 2005 
...............................................................................
Statement of Senator Burns  ...................................................................................
Statement of Senator DeMint  .................................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye  ..................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Kerry  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Lautenberg  ..........................................................................
Statement of Senator McCain  .................................................................................
Statement of Senator Snowe  ...................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens 
................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Vitter  ....................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Page 
1 
5 
19 
2 
2 
6 
7 
3 
29 
1 
2 
4 
4 

Chertoff, Hon. Michael, Secretary, Department of Homeland Security  ..............
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

8 
8 

WITNESSES 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

THE  PROPOSED  REORGANIZATION  OF  THE 

DEPARTMENT  OF  HOMELAND  SECURITY 

TUESDAY,  JULY  19,  2005 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  11:15  a.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Building,  Hon.  Ted  Stevens,  Chairman  of 
the Committee, presiding. 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I  apologize  for  the  delay  in  this  hearing  caused 
by the appearance of India’s Prime Minister before the joint session 
of Congress. 

We  do  welcome  you,  and  we  thank  you  for  coming  to  the  Com-
mittee  to  discuss  your  recently  announced  plan  to  streamline  the 
operations, policies, and structures within your department. 

Congress responded quickly to the September 11 attacks by first 
creating the Transportation Security Administration and soon after 
that the Department of Homeland Security. 

At that time, it was apparent to the U.S. economy that the public 
trust and commercial aviation be restored, and a coordination from 
the Federal bureaucracies and, as well as, with State and local gov-
ernments be achieved to defend against terrorism. 

Being mindful of the speed with which the Department of Home-
land  Security  was  created,  Congress  authorized  the  Secretary  in 
the  ‘‘Homeland  Security  Act’’  to  reassess  the  Department’s  oper-
ation and structures and make modifications where necessary. 

We do commend you, Mr. Secretary, for taking advantage of that 
authority and for your proactive efforts and dedication to make this 
Nation safer. 

The purpose of this hearing is to understand in greater detail the 
processes  by  which  you  have  conducted  your  review,  and  the  orga-
nizational  modifications  you  propose  in  this  effort  to  make  the  De-
partment  of  Homeland  Security  operate  more  efficiently  and  effec-
tively. 

We  have  reviewed  your  plan,  and  I  believe  your  proposals  do 
make  sense,  but  I  think  you  have  to  approach  one  critical  compo-
nent of the security concept. That is the enlistment of more volun-
teers to help defend our homeland. 

Hiring  people  to  do  every  security  job  in  this  country  will  bank-
rupt this country. I firmly believe Americans have been waiting for 
instructions  from  their  government  since  the  attacks  of  September 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

11 so they, too, could play a role, and serve the security of our Na-
tion. 

And  I  will  put  the  rest  of  my  comments  in  the  record,  if  I  may. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Stevens follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

I welcome Secretary Chertoff, and thank him for appearing before the Committee 
today  to  discuss  his  recently  announced  plan  to  streamline  the  operations,  policies, 
and structures within the Department of Homeland Security. 

Congress  responded  quickly  to  the  September  11  attacks,  by  first,  creating  the 
Transportation  Security  Administration,  and  soon  after  that,  the  Department  of 
Homeland  Security.  At  the  time,  it  was  imperative  to  the  U.S.  economy  that  the 
public trust in commercial aviation be restored, and that coordination between Fed-
eral  bureaucracies,  as  well  as  with  State  and  local  governments,  be  achieved  to  de-
fend against terrorism. 

Being  mindful  of  the  speed  by  which  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  was 
created,  Congress  authorized  the  Secretary  in  the  Homeland  Security  Act  to  reas-
sess the Department’s operations and structure, and make modifications where nec-
essary.  I  commend  Secretary  Chertoff  for  taking  advantage  of  this  authority,  and 
for his proactive efforts and dedication to making this Nation safer. 

The  purpose  of  today’s  hearing  is  to  understand  in  greater  detail  the  processes 
by  which  Secretary  Chertoff  conducted  his  review,  and  the  organizational  modifica-
tions  that  he  has  proposed  in  his  effort  to  make  DHS  operate  more  efficiently  and 
effectively. 

I  have  reviewed  the  Secretary’s  plan  and  while  I  believe  many  of  his  proposals 
make  sense,  I  think  the  Secretary’s  review  fails  to  highlight  one  critical  component 
of an effective homeland security approach. That is, the enlistment of volunteers to 
defend the homeland. Hiring people to do every security job will bankrupt this coun-
try. I firmly believe that Americans have been awaiting instructions from their gov-
ernment since the attacks of September 11, so that they can play a role in defending 
this  Nation.  I  can  remember  riding  a  train  from  Texas  to  Los  Angeles  when  I  was 
an Air Force Lieutenant and a local volunteer walked up and down the aisle of the 
train  to  check  each  passenger’s  identification  to  ensure  that  we  were  supposed  to 
be riding the train. 

As  DHS  moves  toward  implementing  the  Secretary’s  plan  in  October,  I  hope  the 

Secretary further studies ways by which he can involve our citizenry. 

The CHAIRMAN. And, Senator Inouye. 

STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

Senator  INOUYE.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  ask 

that my statement be made part of the record. 

I also request that the statement of Senator Rockefeller be made 
part  of  the  record.  Because  of  an  unavoidable  family  matter,  he 
cannot be with us this morning. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Inouye follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
Today, we will examine Homeland Security Secretary Chertoff’s comprehensive re-
view  of  the  Department’s  organization  and  policy  direction.  Specifically,  we  hope  to 
learn  more  about  the  role  of  the  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  in 
this latest reorganization. 

Chairman  Stevens,  Senator  Rockefeller,  and  I,  along  with  Senators  Snowe,  Dor-
gan,  Lautenberg,  Cantwell,  and  Pryor,  introduced  the  Transportation  Security  Im-
provement Act of 2005, S. 1052, to better equip the TSA for its transportation secu-
rity  mission.  I  look  forward  to  hearing  the  Secretary’s  perspectives  on  our  bill  in 
light of his comprehensive review. 

We are anxious to improve our legislation and make certain that the Department 

has what it needs to keep our transportation infrastructure secure. 

Transportation  security  is  economic  and  national  security,  and  the  most  prudent 

step we can take to improve it is to strengthen and empower the TSA. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

While I was encouraged to learn that the TSA will continue to be the ‘‘lead agen-
cy’’ for transportation security, I remain concerned about the proposed realignment’s 
potential  effects  on  port,  rail,  and  transit  security.  The  reorganization  also  appears 
to  have  altered  the  DHS’s  areas  of  concentration,  particularly  regarding  policy,  in-
telligence, operations, and preparedness. 

While  I  commend  the  Secretary  for  this  substantive  undertaking,  I  would  not  be 
doing my job if I did not raise for further discussion three principal areas of concern 
I have with his announcement: 

1. The transfer of port security functions away from the TSA; 
2.  The  Department’s  poorly  defined  commitment  to  rail  and  transit  security; 
and 
3. The future of the TSA’s vetting and credentialing programs, such as the Reg-
istered Traveler program and hazmat background checks. 

Given  the  recent  terrorist  bombing  of  London’s  commuter  rail  and  buses,  the 
bombings  in  Madrid  last  year,  as  well  as  similar  transit  attacks  in  Moscow,  Tel 
Aviv,  and  Tokyo,  we  need  greater  detail  and  attention  to  rail  and  transit  security, 
not less. 

However,  just  one  day  after  the  reorganization  announcement,  in  an  interview 
with  the  Associated  Press,  Secretary  Chertoff  suggested  that  rail  and  transit  secu-
rity would not be a top priority during his tenure. I hope that he will address those 
comments  today,  particularly  since  our  legislation  directs  greater  attention  and 
more resources toward these transportation modes. 

It is a gross miscalculation to de-emphasize rail and transit security. As we have 
witnessed  repeatedly,  transit  systems  are  a  primary  target  for  international  terror-
ists. Such attacks are highly visible, produce mass casualties, cause broad economic 
disruption, and generate widespread fear. 

In fact, a recent Associated Press poll indicated that 57 percent of Americans now 
believe  a  transit-related  attack  in  the  U.S.  is  inevitable.  The  same  poll  also  dem-
onstrated  that  Americans  are  not  shying  away  from  their  daily  routines.  We  must 
show  similar  resolve  and  work  together  to  prove  that  an  attack  is  far  from  certain. 
It  is  our  job  to  do  everything  possible  to  ensure  that  while  the  threat  risk  will 

likely continue, the actual vulnerability will diminish. 

S.  1052  redoubles  our  efforts  to  secure  our  rail  lines,  motor  carriers,  and  ports, 
and  provides  the  Department  with  the  tools  needed  to  accomplish  the  goals  articu-
lated in the Secretary’s review. 

We  look  forward  to  working  with  the  Secretary,  in  the  weeks  and  months  ahead, 

to ensure that our transportation systems are as safe and secure as possible. 

The CHAIRMAN. Senator McCain. 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN MCCAIN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARIZONA 

Senator MCCAIN. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I would just like to say, Secretary Chertoff, I was pleased to hear 
your  philosophies  concerning  the  need  for  the  Department  to  be 
risk-oriented in its decisionmaking processes and act as an effective 
steward of public resources. It is one of the most diverse and larg-
est government agencies. 

And  I  was  also  pleased  to  read  in  your  testimony  your  strong 
commitment  for  improving  our  Nation’s  immigration  policies,  as 
well as, securing our borders. 

And I hope that your visit to the Arizona-Mexico border may help 
shape  your  policy  views.  It  was  not  the  coldest  day  we  have  had. 
And  we  appreciate  the  fact  that  you  were  willing  to  come  to  the 
border  and  see  the  situation  on  the  ground.  And  I  hope  you  will 
come back as we continue to try to improve our border security. 

And,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  have  a  lot  of  things  to  say,  but  I  really 
want  to  hear  from  the  witness.  I  thank  Mr.  Chertoff,  Secretary 
Chertoff, and I congratulate him on the job that he is doing. 

The CHAIRMAN. Senator Vitter, your comments. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

STATEMENT OF HON. DAVID VITTER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM LOUISIANA 

hearing. 

Senator  VITTER.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Thank  you  for  this 

And  I,  too,  want  to  thank  the  Secretary  for  your  work,  Mr.  Sec-
retary.  You  clearly  have  one  of  the  toughest  jobs  in  Washington. 
Thank you for taking it on. 

I  will  be  very  brief  and  I  will  submit  the  rest  of  my  comments 

for the record. 

I,  too,  have  studied  your  proposals.  I  do  have  an  overall  concern 
which  is—and  we  have  talked  about  this  briefly  on  the  phone— 
which  is  a  lot  of  centralization  in  the  front  office  in  Washington 
and  lack  of  a  regional  structure  around  the  country.  And  I  just 
wanted to briefly highlight that concern. 

I continue to believe that to best coordinate emergency prepared-
ness  and  response,  there  should  be  some  regional  structure  in  the 
department rather than all sorts of different agency structures, all 
with communication only to Washington. 

I think regional headquarters and directors would enable the de-
partment  to  better  coordinate  with  local  officials  and  better  facili-
tate preparation and response. 

I think this is particularly true since different regions have very 
different  threats.  For  instance,  my  home,  Louisiana,  has  ports, 
maritime  issues.  But,  Texas,  right  next  door,  has  a  very  different 
major  threat  which  is  the  threat  from  the  border.  And  I  think  re-
gions  could  effectively  help  focus  on  those  different  threats  in  dif-
ferent parts of the country. 

Now,  I  want  to  be  clear.  I  am  not  proposing  some  nationwide 
building  program  of  plush  headquarters  in  regions  around  the 
country.  What  I  am  describing  does  not  have  to  be  a  lot  of  over-
head, a lot of sort of headquarters that are devoid of direct respon-
sibility in terms of the actual work of the departments. 

But  I  would  liken  it  to  combatant  commanders  in  the  field  and 
different  theaters  in  the  military,  strategically  placed  around  the 
Nation,  in  the  case  of  homeland  security,  to  enhance  security  and 
focus  on  the  different  threats  that  different  regions  of  the  country 
face. 

So  that  would  be  my  general  comment  and  concern.  Again,  we 
have talked about this briefly on the telephone. And I will look for-
ward to following up as you develop the structure to see if that con-
cern can be addressed in other ways. 

And,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  will  submit  the  rest  of  my  comments  for 

the record. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you, Senator. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Vitter follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DAVID VITTER, U.S. SENATOR FROM LOUISIANA 
Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  having  this  timely  hearing.  I  appreciate  the  work 
the  Secretary  is  doing,  and  I  look  forward  to  hearing  more  about  the  plans  to  reor-
ganize the Department. 

Mr.  Secretary,  you  have  one  of  the  toughest  jobs  in  Washington,  and  I  applaud 
you for your efforts. I do have one issue, however, with where I see the Department 
heading. 

I believe that to better coordinate emergency preparedness and response, regional 
authorities  should  be  established  in  the  Department.  Regional  directors  would  en-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

able the Department to coordinate better with local officials and facilitate better co-
operation  with  all  the  DHS  agencies,  so  that  everyone  can  work  together  most  effi-
ciently. 

Different  regions  have  different  threats.  For  example,  Louisiana  has  ports  and 
maritime  issues,  but  Texas  has  a  threat  from  the  border.  Every  region  has  a  dif-
ferent  focus  and  needs  a  different  regional  strategy  for  homeland  security.  The 
Coast  Guard  has  a  regional  system  that  is  a  good  example.  The  Coast  Guard  dis-
tricts  were  not  thrown  together  randomly,  but  they  were  designed  with  mission  in 
mind. 

We  need  regional  staff  with  authority  over  the  many  Department  components  in 

an area to command the response needed effectively. 

I  am  not  proposing  a  nationwide  building  program  with  new  plush  headquarters 
around the Nation. Instead, we need to have regional authorities—like commanders 
in the field for the military—strategically placed around the Nation, to provide effi-
ciency to enhance security. 

If  history  teaches  us  anything,  it  is  that  change  is  often  not  received  well,  even 
if  it  is  for  the  common  good.  Let’s  use  the  Department  of  Defense  as  an  example. 
It  took  years  to  integrate  the  services,  to  take  advantage  of  efficient  operations 
and  coordinated  efforts.  Finally,  the  Goldwater-Nichols  Act  of  1986,  made  DOD  a 
functional department. It set up a system to use all the services in a combined way 
to  accomplish  their  tasks,  and  be  able  to  function  effectively  and  respond  to  events 
in  a  coordinated  way.  Some  functions—the  Title  X  functions  like  training,  equip-
ping,  and  managing  resources—were  separated  out  from  the  war-fighter  activities, 
thereby,  allowing  the  Combatant  Commanders  to  concentrate  their  efforts  at  the 
operational and tactical level. 

As in the Department of Defense, we should have the leadership at the top setting 
policy,  but  at  the  same  time,  we  should  empower  regional  directors  of  the  Depart-
ment  of  Homeland  Security—the  equivalent  of  commanders  in  the  field  for  DOD— 
to  perform  day-to-day  operations,  and  make  decisions  to  accomplish  their  mission 
of  securing  our  Nation  and  responding  to  threats.  I  think  this  may  be  the  idea  in 
the  reorganization  plan  with  the  creation  of  an  operations  office,  but  I  think  it  is 
missing a regional component. 

If  you  look  at  Miami,  New  Orleans,  Houston,  or  any  other  area  where  DHS  has 
many component organizations, there is no organization or command structure that 
allows  for  joint  training,  resources,  operations,  or  intelligence  that  will  produce  a 
collective result and stop terrorism. 

Should  an  incident  happen  in  any  of  these  locations,  who  would  be  the  point-of- 
contact in charge? TSA, ICE, USCG? Surely we should not have all the agencies act-
ing  independently,  and  a  command  structure  solely  based  in  Washington  will  not 
be effective. In order to solve this problem, a system with regional directors is need-
ed  to  ensure  efficient  operations  and  the  best,  quickest,  most  effective  response  to 
incidents  and  preparing  for  potential  incidents.  These  regional  directors  should  be 
empowered  to  respond  and  coordinate  preparedness  and  response,  under  guidelines 
established by the Secretary and his leadership team. 

I  would  like  for  the  Secretary  to  explain  why  he  chose  against  a  regional  struc-

ture. 

The CHAIRMAN. Senator Burns. 

STATEMENT OF HON. CONRAD BURNS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MONTANA 

Senator BURNS. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
And welcome, Mr. Chertoff. We appreciate you. 
There are just a couple of areas, and most of the areas are which 
you have already taken a position and thinking about changing. So 
I will look forward to your testimony. 

I  did  want  to  talk  to  you  a  little  bit  about  EAS  airports.  I  think 
there  are  a  couple  of  states  where  we  may  address  a  problem,  but 
that  is  in  question.  But  I  just  look  forward  to  hearing  your  com-
ments this morning. 

And thank you, Mr. Chairman, for this hearing. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator Kerry. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN F. KERRY, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM MASSACHUSETTS 

Senator  KERRY.  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you.  Just  a  brief  state-

ment, if I may. First of all, thank you for holding this hearing. 

Mr.  Chertoff,  thank  you  for  coming  in  and  sharing  some  time 
with us. I was pleased to support your nomination. I know you are 
working hard to protect the country. 

There  are  a  lot  of  areas  to  focus  on.  Obviously,  you  have  heard 

some of them expressed in the concerns of my colleagues. 

I  would  just  like  to  focus  on  one  quickly  in  my  opening  com-
ments,  if  I  can,  and  that  is  the  issue  of  port  security,  specifically 
management  of  the  grant  program,  and  the  status  of  national  pre-
vention and contingency plans. 

In  January,  the  DHS  Inspector  General  issued  a  report  you  are 
well familiar with, saying that the current design of the grants pro-
gram compromises DHS’s ability to direct resources to the Nation’s 
highest priorities. 

And  assessing  the  administration  of  the  program,  the  IG  found 
that  only  one  staff  person  at  TSA  managed  the  distribution  of  811 
grants  in  2003,  found  that  82  of  86  grant  applications  transferred 
from  TSA  to  the  Office  of  Domestic  Preparedness  lacked  merit  but 
still received funding, and most importantly, found that of the $564 
million  that  was  awarded  through  2004,  only  $106  million  was  ac-
tually spent to improve port security. 

This  is  a  fairly  amazing  statistic,  as  well  as  reality,  when  you 
measure  what  experts  have  told  us  about  ports  and  the  potential 
threat which you are well familiar with. 

I  know  that  you  and  DHS  concurred  with  most  of  the  rec-
ommendations,  but  it  has  never  been  set  forth,  sort  of,  precisely 
how that is going to ultimately be implemented. 

Last  week,  on  the  Homeland  Security  Appropriations  bill,  I  sub-
mitted  an  amendment  to  require  the  Inspector  General  and  others 
to report within 90 days detailing how that implementation is tak-
ing place, and will take place. 

So  obviously  I  hope  you  will  cooperate  in  that  effort.  But  more 
importantly, I am really concerned, and I think others are, that we 
remain unprepared. 

Now, I heard your comments the other day, and I respect the dis-
tinction you are trying to draw. I would concur that we cannot pre-
vent everything. And there are certain limits, and there are certain 
realities we have to live with. 

But the department still has not finished a national maritime se-
curity  plan  mandated  by  the  ‘‘Maritime  Transportation  Security 
Act.’’  The  country  still  has  no  plan  to  reroute  commerce  should  a 
port be attacked. And that lack of planning could prove destructive 
to  our  economy  if  there  were  a  major  port  being  closed,  especially 
if oil or natural gas deliveries were stopped. 

So  I  would  urge  you  to  tackle  this.  Obviously  I  have  some  ques-
tions  on  it  when  the  question  period  comes.  I  hope  we  never  need 
it, but there is no doubt in my mind that railroads, highways, and 
cities  are  all  impacted  by  what  does  or  does  not  happen  with  re-
spect to port security itself, because they are so interconnected. 

And  I  will  look  forward  to  having  a  chance  to  explore  this  with 

you a little bit. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

The CHAIRMAN. Senator Lautenberg, you have a comment? 

STATEMENT OF FRANK R. LAUTENBERG, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thanks, Mr. Chairman. Thanks for asking 

Secretary Chertoff here. I am pleased to see him. 

Last week, we saw the beginning of the plan for reorganizing the 
Department of Homeland Security and make it more effective. And 
I congratulate Secretary Chertoff for moving on that front. 

It is a very complicated department or organization, 180,000 peo-
ple,  and  a  merging  of  lots  of  different  departments  of  government. 
So  it  will  not  be  easy  and  it  has  not  happened  yet,  but  we  are  on 
the right track with this. 

Unfortunately last week, I think the Senate in some form under-
mined  what  the  secretary  is  offering  as  his  view  of  how  we  ought 
to distribute funds from the Department of Homeland Security and 
that  is  based  on  risk.  And  instead  we  had  a  vote  that  suggested 
that  no  significant  portion  of  the  funds  ought  to  be  distributed 
based merely on population. 

But if you had an epidemic in California, you would not send the 
vaccine  or  the  antidote  to  Illinois,  and  we  ought  not  to  be  doing 
that here. And I hope that we will be able to confirm that the most 
effective way to protect our society is to distribute funds on risk as-
sessments. 

And  we  congratulate  the  secretary  for  standing  firm  on  that.  He 
said  that  we  should  have  at  least  90  percent  going,  based  on  risk 
assessment  to  those  communities,  those  places  at  risk,  and  last 
week  we  voted  to  reduce  it  to  60  percent.  It  is  not  a  particularly 
good idea. 

In terms of the transportation systems, I disagreed with the sec-
retary  on  the  fact  that  he  suggested  states  ought  to  take  over  the 
security for their own transit systems. But many of these are inter-
state  and  they  are  part  of  an  integral  transportation  system  that 
affects the entire country. 

And  I  do  not  think  that  the  states  are  in  a  position—I  look  par-
ticularly  at  my  state  where  860,000  people,  each  and  every  day, 
take  buses  and  trains  and  rely  on  mass  transit,  public  transit  sys-
tems to move them around. 

And  we  saw  what  happened  in  London,  too,  recently  when  the 
attack took place there and at the transportation, focused on trans-
portation  network  knowing  that  that  would  have  a  devastating  ef-
fect,  not  only  on  the  functioning  of  the  society,  but  the  psychology 
of the society. 

And  I  think  it  is  really  important,  Mr.  Secretary,  that  we  con-
tinue to focus all assistance possible on our transportation systems. 
I look forward to an opportunity to ask some questions. 
And I thank you again, Mr. Chairman, for doing this. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Mr. Secretary, we are pleased to have your statement. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

STATEMENT OF HON. MICHAEL CHERTOFF, SECRETARY, 

DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY 

Mr. CHERTOFF. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, and Ranking Member 
Inouye.  I  request  that  my  full  statement  be  made  part  of  the 
record. 

And  I  thought  I  would  take  the  opportunity  just  very  briefly  to 
outline the highlights and to respond to a couple of, I think, salient 
issues. 

It  is  a  pleasure  for  me  to  be  before  the  Committee.  I  think  it  is 
my first time since I have become secretary. And I look forward to 
continuing to work with the Committee as we go forward, not only 
with  respect  to  the  reorganization,  but  with  respect  to  imple-
menting policies which I know concern all of us very deeply as part 
of the effort to enhance our homeland security. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  We  will  put  your  statement  in  the  record  in  full 
and  all  opening  statements  in  the  record  in  full  without  objection. 

[The prepared statement of Secretary Chertoff follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. MICHAEL CHERTOFF, SECRETARY, 

DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY 

Chairman Stevens, Senator Inouye, and Members of the Committee: 
Thank you for the opportunity to address you today, and for your ongoing support 
of  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security’s  efforts  to  keep  America  secure  and  free. 
I am honored, and pleased, to appear before the Senate Committee on Commerce, 
Science,  and  Transportation  today  to  discuss  the  outcomes  and  results  of  our  Sec-
ond-Stage  review.  Shortly  after  my  confirmation  as  Secretary  of  the  Department  of 
Homeland  Security,  I  announced  my  intention  to  conduct  a  systematic  evaluation 
of the Department’s operations, policies, and structures to ensure that our form and 
function are most effectively aligned to maximize our ability to achieve the security 
outcomes associated with our overriding mission of protecting the homeland. Today, 
I am able to report more fully on the results of that process. 

All  Americans  owe  a  tremendous  debt  of  gratitude  to  the  patriots  and  pioneers 
who  built  this  Department  in  record  time.  Because  of  their  dedication,  security  at 
our  ports,  airports,  critical  infrastructure,  and  borders  has  been  significantly 
strengthened.  Our  nation  has  thwarted  plots  and  captured  terrorists.  As  a  result, 
in the period since 9/11, the American people have begun to live under an umbrella 
of  greater  security,  with  greater  peace  of  mind  than  we  imagined  on  that  terrible 
day. 

My job—and the job of the leadership team at the Department—is to provide the 
strategic  direction,  tools,  and  aggressive  support  needed  by  our  colleagues  to  build 
upon that foundation and continue to advance the effectiveness, agility, and capacity 
of this Department every day. 
2SR Philosophy 

Our review was conducted with several core principles in mind. 
First, as I have said before, DHS must base its work on priorities driven by risk. 
Our  goal  is  to  maximize  our  security,  but  not  security  ‘‘at  any  price.’’  Our  security 
strategy must promote Americans’ freedom, prosperity, mobility, and individual pri-
vacy. 

Second,  our  Department  must  drive  improvement  with  a  sense  of  urgency.  Our 
enemy constantly changes and adapts, so we, as a Department, must be nimble and 
decisive. 

Third, DHS must be an effective steward of public resources. Our stewardship will 
demand  many  attributes—the  willingness  to  set  priorities;  disciplined  execution  of 
those  priorities;  sound  financial  management;  and  a  commitment  to  measure  per-
formance and share results. Perhaps most of all, DHS must foster innovation. 

Finally,  our  work  must  be  guided  by  the  understanding  that  effective  security  is 
built upon a network of systems that span all levels of government and the private 
sector. DHS does not own or control all these systems. But we must set a clear na-
tional  strategy,  and  design  an  architecture  in  which  separate  roles  and  responsibil-
ities for security are fully integrated among public and private stakeholders. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

We  must  draw  on  the  strength  of  our  considerable  network  of  assets,  functioning 
as  seamlessly  as  possible  with  state  and  local  leadership,  law  enforcement,  emer-
gency management personnel, firefighters, the private sector, our international part-
ners,  and  certainly  the  general  public.  Building  effective  partnerships  must  be  core 
to every mission of DHS. 
2SR Process 

From across the Department and elsewhere in the Federal Government, we pulled 
subject  matter  experts  and  talented  individuals  away  from  their  day  jobs  to  focus 
on  how  well  we  tackle  our  tough  fundamental  challenges:  prevention,  protection, 
and all-hazards response and recovery. 

This  Second  Stage  Review  utilized  18  action  teams—involving  more  than  250 
DHS  staff—to  evaluate  specific  operational  and  policy  issues.  We  asked  each  team 
to answer a couple of simple questions. First, freed from the constraints of existing 
policies and structures—writing on a clean slate—how would you solve a particular 
problem? And then, how would you take the best solutions and implement them ag-
gressively? 

We  actively  sought  opinions  from  hundreds  of  public  and  private  partners  at  the 
Federal, State, local, tribal, and international levels. Finally, we examined the DHS 
organizational structure, to make sure that our organization is best aligned to sup-
port our mission. 

This  work,  along  with  the  experience  of  the  last  two  years  in  the  Department’s 

existence, will now play a critical role in setting our agenda moving forward. 
Six Imperatives 

In the weeks and months to come, the Department will launch specific policy ini-
tiatives  in  a  number  of  key  areas.  Here,  then,  are  six  of  the  key  imperatives  that 
will drive the near-term agenda for DHS. We must: 

1. Increase preparedness, with particular focus on catastrophic events. 
2. Strengthen border security and interior enforcement, and reform immigration 
processes. 
3. Harden transportation security without sacrificing mobility. 
4.  Enhance  information  sharing  with  our  partners,  particularly  with  State, 
local, and tribal governments, and the private sector. 
5.  Improve  DHS  stewardship,  particularly  with  stronger  financial,  human  re-
source, procurement, and information technology management. 
6. Re-align the DHS organization to maximize mission performance. 

We  will  put  more  muscle  on  the  bones  of  these  six  areas  and  others  with  addi-
tional  actions  and  policy  proposals  in  the  weeks  and  months  ahead.  But,  for  now, 
let  me  give  you  a  broad  overview  of  our  agenda  for  the  future  of  the  Department. 
1. Preparedness 

First, preparedness. In the broadest sense, preparedness addresses the full range 
of our capabilities to prevent, protect against, and respond to acts of terror or other 
disasters. Preparedness is about securing America’s critical infrastructure, which is 
not a government asset; roughly 85 percent is privately owned or operated. 

At the outset, we must acknowledge that although we have substantial resources 
to  provide  security,  these  resources  are  not  unlimited.  Therefore,  we  as  a  nation 
must make tough choices about how to invest finite human and financial capital to 
attain  the  optimal  state  of  preparedness.  To  do  this  we  will  focus  preparedness  on 
objective measures of risk and performance. 

Our  risk  analysis  is  based  on  these  three  variables:  (1)  threat;  (2)  vulnerability; 
and  (3)  consequences.  These  variables  are  not  equal—for  example,  some  infrastruc-
ture  is  quite  vulnerable,  but  the  consequences  of  attack  are  relatively  small;  other 
infrastructure  may  be  much  less  vulnerable,  but  the  consequences  of  a  successful 
attack are very high, even catastrophic. DHS will concentrate first, and most relent-
lessly, on addressing threats that pose catastrophic consequences. Some of the tools 
needed  to  prevent,  respond,  and  recover  from  such  awful  scenarios  are  already  in 
place; but others need significant improvement. 

The first step in enhancing national preparedness, is establishing a preparedness 
baseline  that  measures  the  effectiveness  of  our  planning  for  preventing,  protecting 
against,  and  responding  to  terrorist  acts  or  disasters.  A  second  stage  review  team 
has, therefore, constructed the model for an analytic matrix that will set that base-
line.  The  matrix  will  allow  us  to  analyze  possible  threats  and  will  map  the  current 
state of prevention, protection, and response planning with regard to each. This ma-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

trix  will  be  a  critical  tool  enabling  us  to  identify  and  remedy  current  gaps  in  pre-
paredness. 

Bringing greater planning discipline to each of these risk scenarios is another di-
mension  of  our  preparedness  mission.  And  simple  common  sense  counsels  that  we 
begin  by  concentrating  on  events  with  the  greatest  potential  consequences.  That  is 
why the Department’s National Preparedness Goal—and additional, risk-based plan-
ning—will form our standard in allocating future DHS grants to our State and local 
partners,  so,  that  we  build  the  right  capabilities  in  the  right  places  at  the  right 
level.  Federal  money  should  be  distributed  using  the  risk-based  approach  that  we 
will apply to all preparedness activities. And DHS needs the discretion to award in-
frastructure protection grants in a more flexible manner, as provided by the Admin-
istration’s proposed Targeted Infrastructure Protection Plan. 

Of  course,  Federal  funds  are  not  the  only  resources  available  to  strengthen  the 
protection of our valued infrastructure. Three years ago, Congress passed the SAFE-
TY Act to enable our private sector partners to develop innovative technology to pro-
tect the homeland, without the fear of unduly high transaction costs imposed by the 
possibility of frivolous lawsuits. There is more opportunity to take advantage of this 
important law, and we will do so. 

Finally, of all the catastrophic threats we face, a nuclear attack on our soil would 
be uniquely threatening to our society. The President’s budget asks Congress to es-
tablish  and  fund  a  Domestic  Nuclear  Detection  Office  (DNDO),  to  develop  and  de-
ploy  the  next  generation  of  systems  that  will  allow  us  to  dramatically  improve  our 
ability  to  detect  and  intercept  a  nuclear  threat.  We  have  begun  to  take  the  steps 
to  make  this  office  a  reality.  The  DNDO  will  report  directly  to  me  under  our  new 
structure—and I ask that Congress support this essential and critical resource. 
2. Borders and Immigration 

Our  second  imperative  is  the  need  to  strengthen  border  security  and  interior  en-
forcement,  as  well  as  improve  our  immigration  system.  We  cannot  have  one  ap-
proach without the other. 

As to the first, we must gain full control of our borders to prevent illegal immigra-
tion  and  security  breaches.  Flagrant  violation  of  our  borders  undercuts  respect  for 
the  rule  of  law  and  undermines  our  security.  It  also  poses  a  particular  burden  on 
our  border  communities.  We  are  developing  a  new  approach  to  controlling  the  bor-
der  that  includes  an  integrated  mix  of  additional  staffing,  new  technology  and  en-
hanced infrastructure investment. But control of the border will also require reduc-
ing  the  demand  for  illegal  border  migration  by  channeling  migrants  seeking  work 
into  regulated  legal  channels.  I  look  forward  to  working  with  Congress  this  year  to 
improve  border  security  significantly  through  the  President’s  Temporary  Worker 
Program (TWP). 

Immigration policy is about more than keeping illegal migrants out. Our heritage 
and  our  national  character  inspire  us  to  create  a  more  welcoming  process  for  those 
who lawfully come to our shores to work, learn, and visit. Secretary Rice and I will, 
in  the  near  term,  announce  a  detailed  agenda  of  work  and  innovation  that  the  De-
partment  of  State  and  DHS  have  begun  together,  to  ease  the  path  for  those  who 
wish  to  legitimately  visit,  study,  and  conduct  business  in  this  country,  while  at  the 
same time ensuring that our national security interests are protected. 

Of course, most people come to our shores to seek a better life for themselves and 
their  children.  Ours  is  a  nation  of  immigrants,  but,  for  legal  immigrants  trying  to 
become  American  citizens,  the  process  can  be  confusing,  frustrating,  and  seemingly 
endless. Part of the problem is that the current business model fosters a long delay 
between  application  and  final  adjudication  of  applicants  for  residence  and  citizen-
ship, during which many applicants stay here as temporary residents. But this sys-
tem  puts  some  of  the  most  important  security  screening  at  the  end  of  a  lengthy 
process rather than the beginning, and leads to an unnecessarily high rate of rejec-
tion late in the process. 

As a result, too often, this system leaves a negative first impression of our nation 
with our new fellow countrymen. Worse yet, it causes unnecessary security risks be-
cause people enjoy temporary residence while we are completing the screening proc-
ess.  Restructuring  this  process  to  enhance  security  and  improve  customer  service 
will be an important part of our agenda. 
3. Transportation Security 

Creating  better  systems  to  move  people  and  goods  more  securely  and  efficiently 

was a core objective in founding DHS. It remains so today. 

(a)  Enhancing  Transit  Safety.  The  recent  tragic  events  in  London  served  as  a  re-
minder of the terrorist threat against innocent civilians in our mass transit systems. 
We  believe  mass  transit  security  is  a  shared  responsibility  between  Federal,  State, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

and local partners, and the Federal Government has provided significant support for 
security  efforts  over  the  past  three  years.  Following  last  year’s  Madrid  train  bomb-
ings, DHS took important action not only by increasing funding for rail security, but 
also  by  conducting  over  2,600  individual  consequence  assessments.  Since  9/11,  the 
Transportation  Security  Administration  and  the  Department  of  Transportation’s 
Federal  Transit  Administration  have  worked  extensively  with  the  transit  industry 
and  first  responders  to  strengthen  the  overall  security  capabilities  of  transit  sys-
tems, with a special emphasis on the largest systems. Together, we have developed 
a  significant  tool-kit  of  protective  measures,  which  include  the  coordination  and 
training  needed  to  recover  from  possible  attacks.  Multiple  funding  streams  within 
DHS  will  be  available  to  support  such  projects,  including  roughly  $8.6  billion  en-
acted  and  requested,  since  2003,  for  our  State  Homeland  Security  and  Urban  Area 
Security Initiative grant programs. 

We  are  also  working  to  develop  next-generation  explosive  detection  equipment 
specifically  for  use  in  mass  transit  systems.  We  will  continue  to  apply  resources  to 
this  groundbreaking  work.  At  the  same  time,  we  must  also  prepare  for  terror  at-
tacks of even greater consequence—attacking transit systems with biological, radio-
logical  or  chemical  agents.  We  plan  to  expand  the  deployment  of  the  PROTECT 
chemical  detection  and  emergency  management  system.  This  capability  has  been 
successfully  prototyped  in  the  Washington,  D.C.  Metropolitan  Area  transit  system, 
and  will  provide  a  significant  and  important  chemical  detection  capability  for  other 
transit systems across the Nation. 

We  also  now  have  a  network  of  bio-sensors,  but  we  will  accelerate  the  develop-
ment  and  deployment  of  next  generation  technologies  that  more  quickly  detect  bio-
logical, radiological and chemical attacks. 

(b) Strengthening Aviation Security. After 9/11, TSA was created to deny terrorists 
the  opportunity  to  use  aircraft  as  weapons  and  to  defend  our  vital  national  infra-
structure.  Extraordinary  progress  has  been  made,  but  more  remains  to  do.  In  avia-
tion,  our  security  and  efficiency  can  be  strengthened  by  better  use  of  technology, 
both existing and next-generation technologies. 

Congress intended TSA to be almost entirely supported by user fees, but it is not. 
The  Administration  has  proposed  a  modest  increase  in  user  fees  to  fund  the  infra-
structure  needed  for  this  job.  I  believe  travelers  are  willing  to  pay  a  few  dollars 
more  per  trip  to  improve  aviation  security  and  enhance  efficiency.  I  look  forward 
to working with both Congress and the aviation industry to find a formula that will 
work.  By  collecting  user  fees  for  aviation,  we  can  free  up  precious  DHS  resources 
for other important security priorities. 

(c)  Passenger  Identity  Screening.  Too  often,  security  screening  for  passengers  at 
airports is frustrating. We are still dependent upon a pre-9/11 technology system to 
conduct  the  most  elementary  form  of  terrorist  screening—matching  names  against 
watch lists. Our job is to identify people at airports whom we already know and be-
lieve  to  pose  a  risk  to  aviation.  Our  existing  watch  list  does  identify  threatening 
people,  but  it  is  not  fully  automated  for  aviation  screening,  and  it  yields  an  unac-
ceptably high number of false positives, which drains our security resources. 

Getting this right is urgent. The short-term solution lies in enhancing our ability 
to  screen  individuals  more  precisely  against  named  terror  suspects,  by  utilizing 
more  precise,  identifying  information,  such  as  date  of  birth.  That  kind  of  system— 
being developed through our Secure Flight program—will limit cases where low-risk 
travelers are selected for additional screening. It will dramatically reduce the num-
ber  of  cases  where  travelers  are  delayed  for  questioning,  simply  because  they  may 
have the same name as someone on the watch list. But even this approach may not 
be complete, because it remains focused on only identifying already known high-risk 
travelers. 

Putting  aside  known  risks,  the  more  comprehensive  and  efficient  passenger 
screening  system  that  DHS  must  develop,  will  give  us  the  ability  to  automatically 
clear  low-risk  travelers.  By  clearing  these  low-risk  travelers,  TSA  can  reasonably 
focus  on  a  smaller  and  more  distinct  pool  of  passengers  that  might  pose  a  threat 
to  aviation.  The  result:  less  frustration;  faster  service;  better  security.  Better  forms 
of screening will also promote privacy, because they will reduce the number of mis-
takes or unnecessary interventions that annoy travelers. 

TSA’s Registered Traveler and Secure Flight programs are keys to increasing the 
precision,  reliability,  and  speed  of  identity  screening  for  domestic  air  travelers. 
Equally  important  are  improved  protocols  to  screen  inbound  international  airline 
passengers  and  expanded  deployment  of  US–VISIT  for  overseas  visitors.  All  these 
screening  programs  should  be  integrated  so  that  screening  is  consistent  and  inter-
operable. 

(d)  (Supply  Chain)  Security  Management.  After  9/11,  this  country  put  in  place 
vital measures intended to protect the global movement of marine cargo that touch-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

es our shores as it moves from origin to destination. U.S. Customs and Border Pro-
tection  is  screening  all  inbound  containers,  and  inspecting  those  that  merit  further 
scrutiny.  Increasingly,  screening  and  inspection  are  taking  place  at  the  port  of  de-
parture overseas—before cargo arrives here. 

But  we  should  not  rest  where  we  stand.  I  believe  that  we  can  gather,  fuse,  and 
assess more complete data from the global supply chain to develop a more accurate 
profile of the history of cargo in a given container. Data about what cargo is moving 
from the initial point of shipping to the final destination, will allow us to target risk 
better.  With  more  informed  targeting,  we  can  more  efficiently  conduct  inspections 
of  cargo  that  is  either  high-risk  or  unverified.  This  ‘‘Secure  Freight’’  initiative  will 
allow  us  to  expedite  large  portions  of  the  inbound  that  sustains  our  Nation’s  econ-
omy, and focus with more precision on the unknown. 

That  brings  us  to  inspections.  We  must  enhance  and  speed  inspections  that  we 
need  to  perform,  so  that  we  minimize  freight  delays,  and  increase  total  inspection 
capacity. To this end, we must complete our deployment of radiation portal detectors 
at  ports,  while  advancing  research  on  more  sophisticated  non-intrusive  detection 
protocols and equipment. 
4. Information Sharing 

The ability to share information with our international, State, and local partners, 
the private sector, law enforcement, and first responders is absolutely critical to our 
success.  Otherwise,  we  are  effectively  tying  the  hands  of  those  who  are  on  the 
ground  and  charged  with  the  responsibility  of  protecting  their  community,  their 
neighbors, and their families. 

We recognize the need for better and more inclusive information sharing. Informa-
tion  sharing  is  a  two-way  street.  Therefore,  we  will  work  with  the  White  House 
Homeland  Security  Council  and  our  Federal  colleagues,  not  only  to  help  forge  com-
mon  Federal  tools  for  information  sharing,  but  also  work  with  state  and  local  offi-
cials—and  private  sector  infrastructure  owners—to  fuse  and  share  a  richer  intel-
ligence base. In short, we will promote greater situational awareness. 
5. DHS Stewardship 

DHS  must  be  a  responsible  steward  of  the  public  trust.  Congress  is  justifiably 
making  significant  investments  in  homeland  security,  and  that  entails  significant 
procurements  at  DHS.  We  must  ensure  that  we  carry  out  these  procurements  re-
sponsibly. 

One  of  my  very  first  acts  as  the  new  Secretary,  was  to  contact  the  Department’s 
Inspector General and my Chief Procurement Officer and instruct them to evaluate 
DHS procurements and our contracting practices. I asked for suggestions regarding 
any needed changes—and I’ve received just that. We will rely on these recommenda-
tions to make procurement integrity and efficiency a management focus throughout 
the Department’s work. 

We  will  also  emphasize  improving  financial  controls  and  financial  systems,  seek-
ing operating efficiencies, strengthening human capital policies, and delivering core 
information technology systems. Last week’s attack in London re-emphasized for me 
the need to act on another Second Stage Review recommendation: better integration 
and consolidation among the Department’s multiple crisis management centers. We 
will do that. 

DHS  employees  also  deserve  an  organization  that  provides  top-notch  professional 
career  training,  an  organization  that  actually  enables  individuals  to  broaden  these 
experiences  by  working  in  other  components  of  the  Department  without  impeding 
their  career  paths.  DHS  should  reward  the  strongest  performers  and  team  players. 
Our review has given us some specific recommendations for building this type of or-
ganization, and we will look forward to sharing more details with employees in the 
weeks and months to come. 
6. DHS Structural Re-Alignment 

I have concluded that some structural changes are needed at DHS to improve mis-
sion  performance.  Modest  but  essential  course  corrections  regarding  organization 
will  yield  big  dividends.  Most  can  be  accomplished  administratively—a  few  require 
legislation. 

These organizational changes include four important areas of focus which include: 
(1)  formation  of  a  new,  department-wide  policy  office;  (2)  significant  improvements 
in  how  DHS  manages  its  intelligence  and  information  sharing  responsibilities;  (3) 
formation  of  a  new  operations  coordination  office  and  other  measures  to  increase 
operational  accountability;  and  (4)  an  important  consolidation  effort  that  integrates 
the Department’s preparedness mission. 

(a) Policy. We propose the creation of a central policy office led by an Under Sec-
retary  for  Policy.  This  office  also  will  bring  together  our  international  affairs  staff, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

a  significant  and  new  strategic  planning  capability,  DHS-wide  policy  development 
assets, a senior policy advisor focused on refugee asylum policies, and enhanced pri-
vate sector liaison resources. Collectively, the Policy Directorate will strengthen the 
Department’s  ability  to  develop  and  plan  vital  policies.  This  office  is  not  a  new 
idea—it builds in part upon the foundational work of the Border and Transportation 
Security  policy  staff,  which  is  to  be  folded  into  the  new  policy  directorate.  Creation 
of a DHS policy shop has been suggested by Members of Congress, Secretary Ridge, 
and numerous outside experts. Now is the time to make this a reality. 

(b) Intelligence. Systematic intelligence analysis lies at the heart of everything we 
do. Understanding the enemy’s intent and capabilities affects how we operate at our 
borders;  how  we  assess  risk  in  protecting  infrastructure;  how  we  discern  the  kind 
of threats for which we must prepare to respond. 

More  than  10  components  or  offices  of  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  are 
intelligence generators, and all of us in the Department are consumers and appliers 
of  intelligence.  We  need  to  have  a  common  picture—across  the  Department—of  the 
intelligence  that  we  generate  and  the  intelligence  we  require.  We  need  to  fuse  that 
information, and combine it with information from other members of the intelligence 
community, as well as, information from our State, local, and international partners. 
DHS  can  also  do  a  better  job  of  sharing  the  intelligence  we  are  gathering,  and 
the intelligence we are analyzing with our customers inside the Department, within 
the intelligence community, and with our frontline first responders at the State and 
local level. 

Therefore,  we  will  designate  the  Assistant  Secretary  for  Information  Analysis  as 
the  Chief  Intelligence  Officer.  The  Chief  Intelligence  Officer  will  head  a  strength-
ened  Information  Analysis  division  that  will  report  directly  to  me.  This  office  will 
ensure  that  intelligence  is  coordinated,  fused,  and  analyzed  within  the  Department 
so  that  we  have  a  common  operational  picture.  It  will  also  provide  a  primary  con-
nection between DHS and others within the intelligence community—and a primary 
source of information for our State, local, and private sector partners. 

(c)  Operations.  Intelligence  and  policy  mean  little  if  not  translated  into  action. 
Under  our  plan,  all  seven  primary  operational  components  will  have  a  direct  line 
to  the  Secretary,  but—to  improve  our  ability  to  coordinate  and  carry  out  oper-
ations—we  will  establish  a  new  Director  of  Operations  Coordination.  The  Director 
of  Operations  Coordination  will  work  with  component  leadership  and  other  federal 
partners  to  translate  intelligence  and  policy  into  actions—and  to  ensure  that  those 
actions are joint, well-coordinated, and executed in a timely fashion. The Operations 
Coordination Director will manage DHS’s hub for crisis management. 

This integrating office will not disrupt our operators in the field, nor will it inter-
fere  with  component  chains-of-command.  We  do  not  aim  to  fix  what  already  works. 
(d) Preparedness. Finally, let me turn to the critical area of preparedness. The De-
partment of Homeland Security has primarily been viewed as a terrorist-fighting en-
tity. But, in fact, we are an ‘‘all hazards’’ Department. Our responsibilities certainly 
include  not  only  fighting  the  forces  of  terrorism,  but  also  fighting  the  forces  of  nat-
ural disasters. 

To ensure that our preparedness efforts have focused direction, we intend to con-
solidate the Department’s existing preparedness efforts—including grants, exercises, 
and  most  training—into  a  single  directorate  led  by  an  Under  Secretary  for  Pre-
paredness. Going forward, FEMA will be a direct report to the Secretary—but it will 
now focus on its historic and vital mission of response and recovery, the importance 
of  which  was  illustrated  powerfully  as  Hurricane  Dennis  made  landfall  this  week. 
The  Preparedness  Directorate  will  continue  to  rely  on  FEMA’s  subject  matter  ex-
pertise and the expertise of our other components in promoting preparedness. It will 
also include our Infrastructure Protection division, as well as the U.S. Fire Adminis-
tration, currently in FEMA, which will strengthen our linkages with the fire service. 
Further,  as  part  of  our  consolidated  preparedness  team,  I  was  pleased  to  an-
nounce  last  Thursday  that  Dr.  Jeffrey  W.  Runge  will  serve  as  the  Department’s 
Chief Medical Officer. Working within the Preparedness Directorate, Dr. Runge will 
be  my  principal  advisor  on  medical  preparedness,  and  will  serve  as  a  high-level 
DHS  representative  to  coordinate  with  our  partners  at  the  Department  of  Health 
and  Human  Services,  the  Department  of  Agriculture  and  State  governments.  The 
Chief  Medical  Officer  and  his  team  will  have  primary  responsibility  for  working 
with HHS and other Departments in completing comprehensive plans for executing 
our  responsibilities  to  prevent  and  mitigate  biologically-based  attacks  on  human 
health and on our food supply. 

We  also  appreciate  both  the  efficiencies  and  the  vulnerabilities  of  the  modern 
technology  on  which  so  much  of  our  society  depends.  To  centralize  the  coordination 
of the efforts to protect technological infrastructure, we will create the new position 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

of  Assistant  Secretary  for  Cyber  and  Telecommunications  Security  within  the  Pre-
paredness Directorate. 
Constantly Improving Our Efforts 

The  six  areas  of  focus  just  described  are  all  areas  that  will  be  priorities  for  the 
Department  moving  forward  in  the  near  term.  They  offer,  at  least,  an  initial  road-
map of large categories of our activity for the months ahead. 

We look forward to working with this Committee, other Members of Congress, our 
colleagues  in  the  Administration,  and  our  partners  to  ensure  that  this  agenda  for 
DHS can be implemented. And we will continue to roll out new thinking and specific 
solutions to the issues that directly affect our security and daily lives. 

Of course, we have not been idle while waiting for this moment. To the contrary, 
we have taken immediate steps to promote security in a commonsense and balanced 
way.  Since  my  confirmation,  for  example,  we  have  resolved  a  long-simmering  dis-
pute  by  supporting  the  placement  of  hazardous  material  warning  placards  on  rail 
cars.  We  have  also  announced  a  plan  to  open  Ronald  Reagan  National  Airport  to 
general aviation. And, we affirmed a strong and achievable implementation plan for 
the Visa Waiver Program that requires biometric technology standards for passports 
issued by program participant nations. 

What is notable about these decisions is that they did not simply pile on security 
restrictions. Instead, we have modified or even relaxed security measures that were 
no  longer  necessary,  where  risk  analysis  warranted.  After  all,  a  balanced  approach 
means that the balance moves down as well as up. 

Moving  forward,  we  will  evaluate  our  decisionmaking,  strengthening  security 
where needed, and eliminating unnecessary burden when possible. Last week, I an-
nounced two decisions that illustrate this approach. 

In the former category, after extensive consultation with the Department of State 
and  the  Department  of  Justice,  DHS  has  decided  to  strengthen  our  US–VISIT  pro-
gram.  In  the  future,  first-time  visitors  to  the  United  States  will  be  enrolled  in  the 
program by submitting ten fingerprints. Subsequent entries will continue to require 
a  2-print  scan  for  verification.  This  will  dramatically  improve  our  ability  to  detect 
and thwart terrorists trying to enter the United States, with no significant increase 
in inconvenience. 

In  the  latter  category,  TSA  will  suspend  the  post-9/11  requirement  that  commer-
cial  airline  passengers  using  Reagan  National  Airport  in  Washington  must  remain 
seated  for  30  minutes  after  departure  and  before  arrival.  This  30-minute  seating 
rule  was  a  sensible  measure  when  first  applied.  Now,  almost  four  years  later,  sig-
nificantly  enhanced  layers  of  security  ranging  from  hardened  cockpit  doors  to  air 
marshals, make it reasonable to eliminate this requirement. 

Our  work  in  protecting  the  homeland  will  always  seek  reasonable  balance.  Over 
time,  as  intelligence  warrants  and  as  progress  allows,  DHS  will  be  open  to  change. 
We  will  be  straightforward.  If  something  goes  wrong,  we  will  not  only  acknowledge 
it,  we  will  be  the  first  to  fix  the  error.  But,  we  also  will  stand  up  and  let  people 
know when we’ve done things the right way, or see a better way ahead. 
Conclusion 

This  is  an  exciting  time  for  our  organization.  Change  brings  opportunity—and 
after an historic first two years—our young Department continues to hold one of the 
most important roles in government—the safety and security of our Nation. 

We  set  these  priorities  for  ourselves,  and  make  these  adjustments  to  the  Depart-
ment  in  order  to  serve  our  mission,  to  protect  our  families,  our  fellow  citizens,  our 
visitors, and our homeland. 

So,  moving  forward  together,  let  us  answer  this  call  by  building  upon  that  which 
has  been  honorably  founded  these  past  two  years  at  DHS.  We  will  proceed  with 
unyielding focus and quiet determination. 

Once again, I thank this Committee for their constant support and valuable input, 
and I look forward to working with you as we move to put these changes into effect. 

Thank you. 

Mr. CHERTOFF. Thank you. 
Obviously,  the  events  of  July  7  are  still  very  much  in  our  mind. 
They are a forceful reminder of the fact that there are enemies out 
there  who  seek  to  hurt  us,  and  seek  to  damage  our  infrastructure, 
our economy, to kill our people. 

They are sophisticated. If they can do it in a way that maximizes 
the  negative  effect  on  our  way  of  life,  they  want  to  do  that.  And 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

as  painful  as  that  attack  is,  and  as  much  of  a  reminder  as  it  is, 
I think it also needs to inspire us to continue to be disciplined and 
strategic  in  the  way  we  think  about  protecting  homeland  security. 
I  should  also  underscore  what  I  think  all  of  us  feel  which  is  our 
tremendous sense of solidarity with the British people, and with all 
those who lost loved ones in that terrible incident of July 7. 

Let me talk briefly about the general outline of our Second-Stage 
Review  and  where  we  are  headed.  But  let  me  pause  just  for  a 
minute,  in  light  of  London,  to  just  emphasize  something  that  I 
think perhaps got drowned out a little bit last week in terms of dis-
cussion about the issue of mass transit security. 

The  whole  issue  of  transportation,  the  whole  issue  of  infrastruc-
ture  in  this  country  is  very  much  on  the  mind  of  those  who  work 
in  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security.  And,  again,  we  want  to 
be  strategic  about  it.  We  want  to  be  risk-based,  which  means  we 
want  to  measure  consequence,  vulnerability,  and  threat  in  assess-
ing  how  to  go  about  doing  what  we  need  to  do  to  protect  America. 
We want to be balanced, and that means we want to always con-
sider  the  costs  involved,  the  fact  that  we  want  to  not  only  protect 
our lives but our way of life, the fact that we want to work as part-
ners  with  other  government  agencies,  State  and  local  government, 
and with the private sector. 

We do not want to own the responsibility. We cannot own the re-
sponsibility  for  homeland  security  alone.  We  must  share  that  re-
sponsibility. 

And  as  you  said,  Mr.  Chairman,  that  sharing  has  to  go  down, 
even to individuals who have to play a role in protecting our coun-
try.  And  we  are  now  advising  people  and  have  advised  people, 
when they get on public transportation, or are in public places, that 
they  be  mindful  and  be  aware  of  what  is  around  them,  and  not 
hesitate  if  they  see  something  suspicious,  such  as  an  unattended 
package, to make that fact known to the authorities. 

So  this  is  very  much  a  shared  issue.  But,  of  course,  we  have  to 
tailor our approach to the particular sector of the economy and in-
frastructure. 

And so, for example, in the area of mass transit where the boots 
on-the-ground  are  largely  owned  by  State  and  local  police,  no  one 
has  suggested,  and  I  do  not  think  anyone  would  suggest,  that  the 
Federal  Government  blunder  in  and  execute  a  mass  takeover  of 
transit police. 

What  we  want  to  do  is  work  with  the  transit  authorities,  with 
the transit police to give them the benefit of our technology, biologi-
cal  detectors,  chemical  detectors,  and  sophisticated  detection  tech-
nology which includes the use of video cameras. And we have done 
that  and  we  are  continuing  to  do  that.  And  I  look  forward  to  talk-
ing about that as we proceed with the hearing. 

The  purpose  of  the  Second-Stage  Review  was  to  take  stock  of 
where  we  are,  recognizing  the  tremendous  challenge  and  accom-
plishment  of  my  predecessor,  and  his  leadership  team  in  this  de-
partment,  but  understanding  that  there  is  room  for  improvement 
and  recognizing  that  we  face  a  dynamic  enemy;  we  need  to  be 
adaptable  and  nimble  in  the  way  we  address  the  challenge  of  ter-
rorism. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

I  wanted  to  lay  out  a  number  of  agenda  items  for  policy  in  my 
remarks  last  week.  They  were  not  meant  to  be  comprehensive. 
There are many things we have to attend to. 

But  among  the  things  I  think  that  are  very  important  are  the 
issue of preparedness, particularly with respect to potentially cata-
strophic  threats  such  as  nuclear  threats,  biological  threats,  chem-
ical  threats,  threats  that  would,  if  they  materialized,  number  cas-
ualties  not  in  the  hundreds  or  thousands  but  in  the  hundreds  of 
thousands  or  millions  perhaps,  and  threats  that  would  have  dev-
astating effects on our cities, our countryside, and our economy. 

Transportation.  Part  of  the  strength  of  the  country  is  the  fluid 
and  convenient  movement  of  people  and  goods,  in  and  out  of  the 
country and throughout the country. We need to make sure we pro-
tect the security of that movement, but that we do it in a way that 
does  not  compromise  the  efficiency  and  the  convenience  which  are 
the hallmarks of our system. 

Borders  and  immigration.  Senator  McCain,  I  was  pleased  and  I 
did find it very, very informative to go down, and actually see, with 
my own eyes, the challenge that is faced by our border patrol down 
in  Arizona,  and  really  across  the  southern  and  the  northern  bor-
ders. 

And  we  are  working  very  aggressively  now  to  come  up  with  an 
integrated,  strategic  approach  to  the  issue  of  controlling  the  bor-
ders.  There  are  some  people  who  say,  well,  you  know,  it  has  not 
been  done  up  to  now,  so  it  cannot  be  done.  I  disagree  with  that. 
I think we can do it. It takes some strategic thinking. It takes the 
application of will. 

I know the public and the Congress are demanding that we take 
action,  and  we  are  very  focused  on  executing  a  strategy  that  will 
get us to where we need to be as quickly as possible. 

Information  sharing.  The  key  to  working  with  partners  is  to 
share information both ways. Some of the elements in the proposal 
I have put forth involve some structural changes. 

One  part  of  what  I  want  to  do  is  invite,  and  I  have,  in  fact,  in-
vited  State  homeland  security  advisors  to  come  meet  with  me  and 
the top leadership team to see how we can move forward on fusion 
centers. 

Management.  We  are  stewards  of  the  public  trust.  That  means 
when  we  get  resources  from  Congress,  we  owe  it  to  the  public  and 
Congress to spend the money wisely and efficiently. We need to do 
some  retooling  of  our  own  structures  and  our  processes  to  do  this. 
One  thing  I  would  observe  in  response  to  Senator  Kerry’s  open-
ing  statement  is,  within  a  very  short  time  after  I  arrived  on  the 
job,  I  called  up  the  Inspector  General  and  I  said,  ‘‘Look,  I  want  to 
get  your  best  learning  on  best  practices,  what  we  are  doing  right, 
what  we  are  not  doing  right,  to  make  sure  that  our  procurement 
and our management is working as best as it could, as it can.’’ 

Finally,  let  me  touch  briefly  on  the  structural  changes  that  we 

are proposing. 

A  centralized  policy  and  planning  office  that  will  give  us  the  ca-
pability to do the kind of strategic policymaking and planning, from 
a  department-wide  perspective,  that  will  allow  us  to  get  our  arms 
around  such  big  issues  as  control  of  the  border,  and  management 
of our transportation security preparedness. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

A  chief  intelligence  officer  who  fuses  all  of  the  information  col-
lected  by  the  eleven  components  in  our  department  that  currently 
deal with intelligence and making us better consumers, better ana-
lysts, and better purveyors of intelligence to our partners. 

Operations, giving us, for the first time, an operational capability 

that spans a department. 

And,  finally,  preparedness,  recognizing  the  unusual  challenge 
that is placed upon us in guiding the preparedness across the coun-
try which requires us not only to work with our sister departments 
here  at  the  Federal  level,  but  with  our  State  and  local  partners, 
and  with  the  private  sector  which,  in  fact,  owns  about  85  percent 
of the infrastructure. 

And that includes particular emphasis on an Assistant Secretary 
to focus on cyber and telecommunications and a Chief Medical Offi-
cer  who  will  look  to  bring  together,  and  manage  the  architecture 
for  our  response  to  biological  hazards,  whether  they  deal  with 
human health, or animal health, and agriculture. 

Finally,  we  are  trying  to  make  sure  we  never  lose  sight  of  com-
mon sense, and that we recognize that balancing means sometimes 
you bring the balance down as well as up. We do not want to only 
enhance  burdens  on  the  public,  we  want  to  relieve  burdens  where 
prudence and sound judgment suggest we can do that. 

And two initiatives I announced last week, which I think embody 
that, are the decision to go forward with a ten fingerprint scan for 
new  visitors  to  the  United  States  that  will  build  upon  US–VISIT 
and make it even more effective. 

And, finally, our relaxation of the 30-minute rule with respect to 
Reagan  Airport,  which  was  done  not  only  to  alleviate  the  burden 
on passengers, but really, as a recognition that as we scale up what 
we  do  to  protect  aircraft,  we  should  be  open  to  scaling  down  bur-
dens  that  are  no  longer  necessary,  in  order  to  make  sure  we  have 
security. 

So that is our agenda. We have got much more work to do. I look 
forward  to  working  with  the  Committee  in  pursuing  these  goals. 
And I am delighted to answer questions. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much, Mr. Secretary. 
Senator McCain. 
Senator  MCCAIN.  Mr.  Secretary,  I  was  impressed  by  your  state-
ment  that  we  need  to  secure  the  borders  and  also  discussions  we 
have had. We need to use better technology. 

I  think  the  temperature  on  the  border  today  across  Arizona, 
Texas,  New  Mexico,  and  California  is  probably  in  the  120  degrees. 
And it is very hard on people. 

It  seems  to  me  that  UAVs,  lasers,  and  technology  is  probably  a 
better  approach  than  just  hiring  more  people,  although  I  certainly 
think we need more people. 

I  am  curious  about  your  views  about  our  relationship  with  the 
Mexican government as to the need for cooperation there, and also 
your  views  on  what  kind  of  immigration  reform.  I  think  you  were 
talking  about  a  guest  worker  program  to  relieve  some  of  the  pres-
sures on the border. 

And  are  you  concerned  about  the  increasing  numbers  of  people 
from, ‘‘countries of interest’’ that are coming across our border and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

we  do  not  have  the  ability  to  detain  them,  so,  therefore,  they  get 
a permission slip and move on? 

I  know  that  is  a  number  of  questions,  but  I  am  very—I  think 

they are sort of connected. 

Mr.  CHERTOFF.  Well,  I  will  try  to  address  each  of  them  in  turn. 
I  begin  by  saying,  I  agree.  This  is  a  solution  that  requires  smart-
ness  of  technology,  not  merely  additional  agents,  although  addi-
tional agents are part of it. It requires looking at the whole system 
and integrating the technology and the people. 

And  that  I  think  also  applies  to  the  question  of  what  do  we  do 
with people after we catch them. Simply catching them and releas-
ing them into the general public is not a solution. It is simply mov-
ing  the  problem  around  into  a  different  arena.  So,  I  think  a  sys-
tems approach makes a lot of sense. 

The issue of crossing the border, particularly at this time of year 
when  it  becomes  a  true  humanitarian  issue,  I  think  is  one  that 
ought  to  concern  not  only  this  country,  but  the  Mexican  govern-
ment as well. 

I have spoken with my counterpart, both the current Ministry of 
Government  over  there  and  his  predecessor,  Senior  Creole.  We 
have made it very clear that we think this is a humanitarian issue, 
as well as an issue that affects us as a country. 

And we are anxious to cooperate with them, and we have cooper-
ated  with  them  in  helping  them  do  what  they  ought  to  do,  which 
is to focus on the smuggling organizations that cause an enormous 
amount  of  damage  to  people  who  are  victimized,  including  encour-
aging  people  to  cross  the  desert,  and  putting  them  in  a  situation 
where many of them lose their lives. 

We are encouraging them to do things like focus on the organiza-
tions. We are exchanging information with them. There is no ques-
tion that part of our strategy has to include disabling those groups 
that profit off the smuggling of people into this country. 

Another element has to be trying to remove some of the incentive 
which,  of  course,  is  the  demand  that  pulls  people  into  the  labor 
market  here.  And  that  means  trying  to  create  a  structured,  regu-
lated channel to bring people in to do work for which there is obvi-
ously  a  substantial  market,  thereby  reducing  some  of  the  pressure 
to move illegal people into the country. 

And  I  think  if  we  do  that,  we  allow  ourselves  to  target  our  re-
sources  more  effectively  on  keeping  out  those  people  who  are  not 
coming in to work, but are potentially coming in to commit crimes, 
or to commit acts of violence, or even terror. 

Finally,  on  the  issue  of  other  than  Mexicans,  I  think  it  is  unac-
ceptable  to  have  a  situation  where  we  release  a  large  number  of 
people on their recognizance, or on bond because we cannot simply 
send  them  back  to  Mexico,  and  because  it  takes  a  certain  number 
of days to get them removed to their home countries. 

Part of this idea of putting together a program, a strategic view, 
is  to  look  at  that  entire  system.  And  that  means  we  not  only  have 
to  get  access  to  more  beds,  so  we  can  detain  people,  which  would 
in turn allow us to do expedited removals, we have to then look at 
what  are  the  obstacles  that  are  preventing  us  from  sending  people 
back quickly. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

Sometimes  that  means  other  countries  that  are  dragging  their 
feet, frankly, in terms of accepting their own citizens back. And we 
have got to push them to make sure that does not happen, and we 
may have to push them pretty hard. 

Part of it may be use of technology, for example, to speed up con-
sular conferences, which now we wait for a consular officer to come 
visit  a  detention  facility.  That  has  to  happen  before  we  can  move 
somebody  back.  Maybe  we  ought  to  do  video  conferencing  and  cut 
the wait from days to hours. Maybe we need to put some additional 
resources into flying people back. 

We are looking at the whole system, and it is very much our ob-
jective  to  move  briskly  to  eliminating  the  release  of  these,  other 
than Mexicans on bond, and also to speed up the cycle in which we 
move  them  back.  And  I  think  if  we  do  that,  we  will  be  taking  a 
big  step  forward  in  doing  what  we  need  to  do  to  get  control  of  our 
borders. 

Senator  MCCAIN.  Well,  I  thank  you  very  much  for  that  com-
prehensive  answer.  And  obviously  we  need  to  get  the  attention  of 
the  Administration,  and  our  colleagues,  to  the  compelling  need  for 
overall  campaign  finance  reform.  And  I  think  your  comments  both 
here, and publicly, can be very helpful. 

I  would  be  remiss  without  asking  you  what  the  lessons  of  what 
happened  in  London,  how  they  apply  to  us,  that  maybe  you  could 
just provide us with what you have learned so far. And thank you. 
Mr. CHERTOFF. I think it—we do not have all the lessons yet be-
cause we do not—obviously we are working with the British to get 
a full picture of the plot. 

I  think  there  is  a  recognition  that  although  we  do  tend,  and  I 
think  properly  tend  to  focus  on  people  coming  in  from  outside,  we 
also have to focus on so-called sleeper cells inside the country. And 
that  is—you  know,  one  of  the  reasons  that  getting—making  sure 
we  have  good  intelligence,  real-time  intelligence  about  what  is 
going on with potential sleeper cells in the United States, is an im-
portant component of our preventing these acts. 

And  I  will  take  the  opportunity  to  say,  you  know,  the  ‘‘Patriot 
Act,’’ which gave us some of the tools to do this, in my prior experi-
ence  as  Head  of  the  Criminal  Division  was  a  very,  very  important 
tool  in  giving  us  the  kind  of  awareness  of  what  is  going  on  in  this 
country that we need in order to protect ourselves. 

Senator MCCAIN. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Senator Vitter. He’s gone. 
Senator DeMint. 

STATEMENT OF HON. JIM DEMINT, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM SOUTH CAROLINA 

Senator DEMINT. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Thank  you,  Mr.  Chertoff.  I  appreciate  your  being  here.  I  am  en-
couraged by your comments today and over the previous week, your 
ideas  for  reform.  Obviously  we  cannot  protect  every  public  forum 
in this country. 

It  is  frustrating  to  recognize  that,  but  we  clearly  cannot  have 
protection on everything that is in public here. So I continue to be-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

lieve that the President’s strategy to pursue terrorists wherever we 
can find them, before they get here, is the right approach. 

I  am  encouraged,  as  is  Senator  McCain,  your  emphasis  on  the 
border. There is no way we can protect anything inside this country 
if we are not able to control who is coming and going. So if we are 
coming  down  this  funnel,  in  effect,  it  seems  like  we  have  got  to 
work on the big targets like our border. 

I  also  appreciate  internally,  your  emphasis  on  major  priorities 
and  weapons  of  mass  destruction.  While  politically  that’s  going  to 
be  very  difficult,  and  we  have  already  seen  the  fallout  of  you  at-
tempting to use our resources in a way that could prevent a large- 
scale attack that could, you know, just cripple our economy in addi-
tion to killing and hurting thousands of people, it is going to be dif-
ficult  not  to  continue,  for  political  reasons,  to  spread  our  resources 
over every area that might be attacked. 

I guess my question to you is, I guess as you wade into this and 
start to set priorities, knowing there is going to be a lot of political 
pressure  to  divide  resources  of  every  bus,  train,  football  game,  or 
whatever,  can  we  as  an  Agency,  the  way  you  are  structured  and 
with,  I  guess,  the  way  we  are  organized  and  democracy  in  this 
country, can you stand the political pressure and move ahead with 
what clearly I think you are on the right track to do? 

I know it is a hard question to answer in this forum, but I guess 
my encouragement would come from knowing that there is a deter-
mination  in  your  Agency  and  the  White  House,  and  hopefully  to  a 
large  degree  in  Congress,  to  let  you  do  your  job  to  protect  us.  Can 
you do that? What signals do you see so far politically? 

Mr.  CHERTOFF.  Well,  Senator,  let  me  say  when  I—in  the  5 
months, little over 5 months I have been on the job, there has been 
a complete consistency in approach not only in my department but, 
you know, in the White House, all over the Administration. 

And  we  need  to  be  risk-focused  in  the  way  we  deal  with  home-
land  security.  I  think  when  you  live  every  day  with  looking  at  the 
threats that are out there, and there are a wide variety of different 
kinds  of  threats—some  of  them  are  more  imminent  than  others— 
I  think  you  become  acutely  aware  of  the  need  to  make  sure  that 
we  are  applying  our  resources,  not  only  in  ways  that  will  avoid 
short-term  threats,  but  long-term  threats.  Some  of  the  long-term 
threats as you observed are really potentially catastrophic. 

When you envision some of the types of things that are out there 
with weapons of mass effect and the consequences, you realize that 
even if there is no imminent threat, we have to start to think about 
building  protections  that  will  take  us  out  maybe  a  year,  2  years, 
5 years, even 10 years, because the consequences would be so seri-
ous. 

I think, you know, my basic principles in trying to move forward 
on  this  are  these.  I  will,  and  I  think  everyone  in  my  department 
will  be  forthright  about  how  we  see  it.  You  are  going  to  hear  the 
same answer whether we get asked the question here, or get asked 
the  question  somewhere  else.  We  are  going  to  be  consistent  about 
it. 

We  want  to  make  sure  we  always  work  within  the  system,  and 
not  break  the  system,  in  order  to  protect,  meaning  that  as  we  de-
vise  an  approach  to  protecting  our  rail,  or  protecting  our  aviation, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

or  protecting  something  else,  we  do  not  want  to  become  so  focused 
on security that we destroy that which we are trying to protect. 

We  need  to  be  balanced.  And  we  need  to  make  sure  that  we  do 
not  give  the  terrorists  the  victory  that  would  come  by  turning  us 
into  a  fortress  state.  We  do  not  want  to  be  a  fortress  state.  We 
want to be secure, but we do not want to be a security state. 

Finally, partnership is really important. I think the way to move 
forward on this is to work with our partners in State and local gov-
ernment, and in the private sector, so we all bring our advantages 
to the table. There are some things that local government does very 
well. They do better than we do. 

The  transit  police,  the  local  police  who  are  the  eyes  and  ears, 
who  know  the  community  are  a  critical  resource  in  terms  of  pre-
vention  and  intelligence.  I  do  not  want  to  supplant  them  or  push 
them aside. I want to work with them. 

On  the  other  hand,  we  have  the  ability  in  the  Federal  Govern-
ment to focus on cutting-edge technology, detection equipment that, 
for  example,  allows  us  to  rapidly  detect  biological  or  chemical  haz-
ards.  We  ought  to  be  bringing  that  to  the  table,  whether  it  be  in 
the rail system or in other public settings. 

So if we think, if we are smart, we are cooperative, we are part-
nership oriented and we are balanced, I think there is a good pros-
pect  in  giving  the  American  people  what  they  have  a  right  to  ex-
pect which is security that allows them to continue to live in a way 
that we all cherish, but protects our lives and the lives of our loved 
ones, and our country. 

Senator DEMINT. Thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator Burns. 
Senator BURNS. Mr. Secretary, there are a couple of areas I want 
to pursue. I noticed in the press that you are pursuing another se-
curity fee for the aviation industry and its passengers. And I think 
both Houses of Congress have spoken to that very loudly in the last 
couple  of  years.  And  I  see  no  reason  why  you  should  pursue  that 
because I do not perceive it to become a reality. 

But  I  mentioned  to  you  about  which  I  am  very  much  interested, 
and  I  Chair  the  Aviation  Committee  here,  and  the  Subcommittee, 
and we are looking at the FAA and an overhaul there on reauthor-
ization next year. 

I  like  your  idea  on  Registered  Traveler.  I  think  that  program 
should  be  accelerated.  We  note  that  most  of  the—all  of  the  trav-
elers  that  were  pre-9/11,  are  back  with  us.  We  have  a  growing 
problem now that they are flying in regional jets. 

There  are  more  airplanes  in  the  air  now  than  there  ever  has 
been  to  carry  those  people.  And  so  it  is  causing  some  congestion 
problems,  not  only  in  our  skies,  but,  also,  whenever  we  start  talk-
ing  about  our  facilities  to  secure  our  airports  and  to  tighten  them 
up. 

So  I  am  very  much  interested  in  your  Registered  Traveler  pro-
gram,  also  the  new  technologies  to  be  used  at  airports,  and  I  also 
liked  your  idea  on  risk-based  management  approach.  In  that  area, 
we have a situation, as far as airlines are concerned. 

I have a feeling that as we increase our security around our more 
populated  areas,  we  tend  to  forget  that  we  have  got  about  580 
miles of border with Canada, which is very porous. We have farm-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

ers  that  farm  both  sides  of  that  border,  as  you  well  know.  They 
own  land  in  Canada,  and  they  also  own  land  in  Montana.  So  we 
have  been  spoiled  up  there  because  of  our  freedom  to  move  back 
and forth on that border. 

But we also have a situation with our smaller EAS communities, 
essential  air  service  communities,  where  they  have  no  screeners, 
which poses a problem that if you get on an airplane in Wolf Point, 
Montana,  which  is  only  40  miles  from  the  Canadian  border,  and 
you check your luggage, they bring it to—say your mini-hub is Bil-
lings,  they  have  to  reclaim  that  luggage  if  they  are  transferring  to 
another  flight  and  reclaim  it  and  then  recheck  in  again  and  back 
through security. 

This  is—and  I  think  only  Montana  and  New  Mexico  has  this 
problem.  And  I  would  caution;  I  think  New  Mexico  poses  more  of 
a  problem  than  does  Montana.  But  what  it  does,  you  have  to  have 
a lot more connection time in order to facilitate the traveling. 

I  would  just—we  can  get  together  on  that.  We  can  talk  about 
that  and  maybe  we  can  come  up  with  ways  to  take  care  of  that  in 
those areas. 

But  as  far  as  your  new  technology  concern  and  this  situation, 
risk-based  management,  I  applaud  you  because  we  have  to  use 
some common sense. 

I  think  Senator  DeMint  is  exactly  right.  There  is  not  enough 
money in this government to protect every nook and cranny of this 
country, because people are mobile. We have a mobile society. They 
do not want to lose that freedom. 

And  so  as  the  Chairman  had  mentioned  the  other  day,  we  are 
going  to  have  to,  I  think,  probably  most  of  our  security  in  some  of 
these areas is going to have to be home-grown, volunteers, and peo-
ple  who  notice  things  and  have  the  capability  of  heading  off  some 
things. 

But  Intel  is  very  important.  And  you  mentioned  it  a  while  ago. 
If  you  have  an  intelligence  office  within,  how  will  that  fit  in  with 
what  we  have  done  with  the  rest  of  the  intelligence  community  in 
bringing  together  a  czar,  so  to  speak,  for  intelligence  in  this  coun-
try? 

Mr. CHERTOFF. Senator, let me try to respond to—— 
Senator BURNS. I know it is a whole load of stuff, but I give you 

the whole load of hay in one wagon. 

Mr.  CHERTOFF.  I  will  try  to  take  the  pitch  fork  and  go  through, 
you  know.  Let  me  start  with  the  last  question  which  may  be  the 
shortest answer. 

I  think  what  we  are  going  to  do  by  getting  someone  in  our  De-
partment  who  will  be  the  coordinator  of  all  intelligence  that  we 
generate,  and  we  generate  a  lot  because  we  have  interactions  at 
the  border  that  actually  have  some  very  interesting—yield  some 
very  interesting  insights,  we  have  one  point  of  contact  with  the 
DNI,  the  new  intelligence  Czar,  which  I  think  will  make  his  job 
easier. 

But, frankly, I think it will give us a better seat at the table, and 
make sure that we have a better ability, as we provide more to our 
partners  in  the  community,  to  also  ask  that  we  have  more  elbow 
room  and  better  visibility  into  what  they  are  generating,  which  is 
important for our mission. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

Let  me  talk  more  generally  about  the  issue  of  aviation  security. 
It  is  true  that  I  have  pursued  a  very  modest,  I  think,  a  $2  or  $3 
additional passenger fee for aviation security. Evidently I have not 
pursued it too successfully. 

But I think my theory is this: obviously we need to do something 
to move our general aviation security posture into the next genera-
tion  meaning  we  need  to  get  better  technology,  we  need  to  have 
Registered Traveler programs that allow us to focus more on people 
that  we  have  reason  to  wonder  about,  and  we  also  need  machines 
that  will  allow  us  to  do  a  quicker  and  less  cumbersome  process  of 
screening. I think that is going to benefit everybody. 

And  if  to  do  that,  in  order  to  move  that  online,  we  can  ask  the 
public to give us a couple of dollars, what I call the price of a soda 
and  a  newspaper  at  the  airport,  and  use  some  other  techniques  to 
accelerate the ability to acquire and deploy this kind of machinery. 
I  think  that  additional  money  will  be  money  well  spent.  And, 
frankly, I think it will be money that benefits the airline industry, 
because it will make it more convenient for travelers, which means 
you will get more people using the airports. 

And, of course, ultimately the aviation industry shares the same 
interest  in  security  we  all  do.  We  know  that  the  business  of  avia-
tion  depends  upon  people  having  confidence  in  security.  And  I 
think  it  would  be  more  devastating  to  the  industry  to  have  that 
confidence shaken. 

So  I  would  like  to  continue  to  work  with  Congress  to  see  a  way 
to  get  adequate  resources,  to  let  us  really  move  forward  on  next- 
generation technology. And I think at the end of the day, that will 
make people happier travelers and happier travelers, I think, make 
for frankly better business for the aviation industry and for a safer 
airline system. 

Senator  BURNS.  Well,  the  airlines  will  tell  you  that  it  is  pretty 
hard  to  pass  along  any  fees  back  to  the  passenger  now,  because  it 
takes  away  their  ability  to  adjust  for  their  cost.  And  from  what  I 
have seen, they are right about that. 

And  as  far  as  your  traveler  is  concerned,  you  know,  we  had  to 
take off our shoes. It cost me a couple of—well, about a dozen pair 
of  socks,  I  suppose.  And  I  wear  awfully  good  socks.  And  that  hap-
pened. 

But  I  also  found  out  they  get  very  nervous  when  you  have  a  set 
of  spurs  in  your  bag,  if  you  are  traveling  between  here  and  Mon-
tana  too.  I  never  got  those  spurs  back.  But,  anyway,  we  would 
work with you. 

And  as  far  as  the  EAS,  I  think  we  would  work  with  you  and 
come  up  with  some  plan.  When  we  reauthorize  the  aviation  part 
of that, we want you to be involved in that a little bit, because we 
feel like that it is part and parcel of what we are trying to do with 
the new technologies that we are going to employ. 

We are going to change the FAA just a little. And, of course, that 
is  a  very  slow  process,  as  you  well  know,  understanding  the  bu-
reaucracy.  And  I  thank  you  for  your  willingness  to  cooperate  and 
to communicate on that issue. 
Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Senator Kerry. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

Senator KERRY. Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
I  was  kind  of  curious  what  the  Senator  uses  the  spurs  for  in 

Washington, but I will not go there. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator KERRY. Mr. Secretary, as I mentioned in my opening, the 
‘‘Maritime  Transportation  Security  Act’’  requires  the  maritime  se-
curity plan. This is prior to your coming in. It was passed in 2002. 
It did not have a deadline in it. 

But  because  the  deadline  was  not  met  by  DHS  again  prior  to 
your coming there, the Congress put a December 31, 2004, deadline 
into  the  Intelligence  Reform  Bill.  That  was  missed  by  DHS,  who 
then said it would be completed by April 1, 2005. That was missed. 
It was not completed. 

It  was  then  expressed  to  this  Committee’s  staff  that  it  would  be 
expected  on  June  1.  That  deadline  has  passed.  And,  again,  there 
is still no plan. 

So  the  question  looms  large,  particularly  in  light  of  what  you 
have  said  about  catastrophic  possibilities,  why  no  plan,  where  is 
the plan, when can we expect the plan? 

Mr.  CHERTOFF.  Well,  Senator,  I  know  we  are  working  on  this 
issue  both  in  terms  of  the  maritime  security  plan,  and  what  we 
called,  ‘‘maritime  domain  awareness.’’  And  it  is  in  the  interagency 
process; meaning that we are coordinating this, obviously, not only 
with agencies within DHS like Customs and Border Protection and 
Coast  Guard,  but  also  with  Department  of  Defense  and  Depart-
ment of Transportation. 

I  guess  the  lesson  I  have  drawn  from  the  recitation  of  missed 
deadlines is, I ought to hesitate to give you a deadline here if I am 
not  comfortable  that  I  can  back  it  up.  But  I  will  get  back  to  you 
with what the deadline is. 

But on the other hand, I would not want to leave the impression 
that we are not working on it, or we are not doing additional things 
in the area of port security, because one of the things which we fo-
cused  on,  as  part  of  this  review  is,  the  whole  issue  of  how  do  we 
deal  with  the  problem  of  cargo  and  people  coming  into  our  ports 
through  the  maritime  domain,  and  to  start  to  think  about  more 
comprehensive policies to deal with the major threats. 

And  as  I  know  you  know,  when  you  look  at  the  ports,  there  are 
threats that both come from the land side and from people mount-
ing a direct attack on the port itself. 

And then there is the somewhat distinct question of cargo coming 
in,  which  is  the  whole  container  issue,  which  we  are  dealing  with 
partly  through  targeting  and  screening,  partly  through  detection 
equipment,  but  which  also,  I  think,  ultimately  requires  us  to  look 
more comprehensively at the whole way in which the cargo system 
and the container system operates. 

Senator KERRY. Well, can I interrupt you—— 
Mr. CHERTOFF. Sure. 
Senator  KERRY.—there  for  a  minute  just  to  kind  of  use  the  time 
as effectively as we can? I appreciate what you are saying. But you 
said, and I accept what you said, that the catastrophic threat with 
devastating  impact  is  the  most  significant  thing  we  need  to  be 
thinking about. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

We  have  discovered  containers  with  human  beings  in  them  who 
have  been  smuggled  in,  and  they  died.  And  there  are  others  who 
have gotten in obviously. 

Containers,  according  to  most  experts,  are  one  of  the  prime  tar-
gets  because  there  are  millions  of  them.  And  we  are  currently  in-
specting what percentage now, are we up to two, three percent? 

Mr. CHERTOFF. I think it is a little more than that, but we screen 

a hundred percent. We inspect some small portion of those. 

Senator KERRY. And the question is, when you look at the poten-
tial  of  either  dirty  bombs,  or  biological,  or  other  kinds  of  threats, 
why  some  of  the  proposals  with  respect  to  security  and  tracking 
have not been put in place over the course of a 4-year period? Why 
a  more  robust  inspection  process  when  law  enforcement  itself  sug-
gests that unless you get up around 20 percent, you are not reach-
ing a sufficient deterrent level? 

So the question is, how do we get there and particularly in view 
of  the  fact  that  out  of  $564  million,  only  $106  million  has  been 
spent as of several months ago? 

Mr.  CHERTOFF.  Let  me  tell  you  where  we  have  been,  what  we 
have  done  so  far,  and  where  we  are  going.  We  screen  a  hundred 
percent  of  the  cargo  that  comes,  and  we  inspect  a  percentage  of  it 
based  upon  how  we  score  the  risk  of  the  cargo,  depending  on, 
among  other  things,  what  we  know  about  the  shipper,  what  we 
know  about  the  underlying  cargo,  whether  the  shipper  is  involved 
in essentially a Registered Traveler program. 

And then with respect to inspection, we are in the process of de-
ploying  detectors  that  can  detect  radiation  as  well  as  nonintrusive 
screening  devices.  For  example,  something  that  allows  you  to  es-
sentially look into a container—— 

Senator KERRY. I am familiar with it. 
Mr. CHERTOFF.—and determine whether there is something there 

that is a danger. So—— 

Senator KERRY. The point is that technology has existed now—— 
Mr. CHERTOFF. Correct. 
Senator  KERRY.—for  some  period  of  time.  If  we  are  on  a,  quote, 
‘‘war footing’’ and we have this available funding—obviously we do 
not  have  all  the  money  in  the  world,  but  we  do  have  money  that 
is  unspent—why  has  that  not  been  put  on  a  sort  of  ‘‘war  footing’’ 
deployment schedule? 

Mr.  CHERTOFF.  Well,  I  think  some  of  the  money  that  is—when 
you deal with money that is unspent, I think some of that involves 
grants,  and  I  think  one  of  the  issues  with  grants  is—of  course, 
sometimes  the  grantee  does  not  spend  the  money  that  quickly. 
Sometimes, of course, they have to obligate the money first, as you 
know,  and  then  they  only  draw  down  the  money  once  they  get  the 
delivery of the goods. 

I  guess  for  the  public,  the  way  I  would  explain  it  is,  you  know, 
when I get a contractor in the house, first I get him to sign up with 
a contract, but I do not pay him the money until he does the work. 
Sometimes  that  takes  a  month.  Sometimes  it  takes  more  than  a 
month.  And  that  is  just  kind  of  common  sense.  You  do  not  want 
to pay until you get the stuff. And that is sometimes why there ap-
pears to be a delay in drawing down the funds. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

Senator  KERRY.  A  lot  of  Americans  would  ask  the  very  practical 
question  of  how  many  years  does  it  take,  how  many  months  does 
it take when your security is at risk. 

Mr.  CHERTOFF.  It  should  not  take  years.  And  one  of  the  things 
we  want  to  do  is  work  with  our  grantees  to  make  sure  they  are 
more  prompt  about  obligating,  and  getting  contractors  who  deliver 
more quickly so we can pay the money out. 

But  I  will  say  we  have  deployed  dozens  and  dozens  of—I  do  not 
have the exact figure—but many radiological detectors in ports. We 
have got them, a number of ports now completely covered by radio-
logical detectors. 

But again, we also want to move to the next level of technological 
ability which is one of the reasons we have pushed so hard for this 
Domestic  Nuclear  Detection  office,  because  in  the  end,  we  really 
need  to  get  a  better  quality  of  detector.  We  have  a  good  quality 
now,  but  a  better  quality,  and  that  means  we  have  got  to  jump 
start some research and really move forward on it. 

So  I  share  your  urgency.  And  one  of  the  things  I  am  very  eager 
in doing is continuing to push our initiative overseas. We now have 
a number of foreign ports where we do the inspection overseas. We 
need  to  continue  to  do  that  and  work  with  our  allies  overseas  to 
really get a global network of these inspections. 

Senator  KERRY.  Well,  I  could  not  agree  more.  The  only  frustra-
tion  that  I  have,  and  a  lot  of  people  have,  is  that  we  have  been 
talking  about  this  for  several  years.  This  priority  of  getting  the 
ports abroad involved in the full inspection, as well as the tracking 
security  devices  to  make  sure  there  has  been  no  tampering  during 
transit, has all been part of the discussion for a long period of time 
now. And it seems to me, we have been frustrated. 

The  last  question  just  quickly.  The  light  is  on.  Do  you  feel  as  if 
you—I  know  there  has  been  a  struggle.  You  testified  in  the  House 
about the risk-based judgment of where the grants should go. Sen-
ator Lautenberg raised part of the risk question. 

But  Congress  has  frustrated  you,  to  some  degree,  by  insisting 
this  be  a  competitive  program.  And  my  question  to  you  is,  do  you 
have—do  you  believe  the  power  now  to  be  able  to  assert  the  risk, 
awarding  of  those  grants  sufficiently,  or  is  Congress  still  standing 
in the way of that? 

Mr. CHERTOFF. You know, I think as the President’s budget pro-
posal  indicated,  our  fondest  desire  would  be  to  have  a  situation  in 
which  as  much  of  the  money  as  possible  is  not  driven  by  a  geo-
graphically-based formula, but driven by risk altogether. 

I think under that kind of a system, we—I do not know that you 
can  call  them  winners  or  losers  because  it  would  not  be  driven  by 
political jurisdiction. It would be driven by where the consequences 
would  be,  where  the  vulnerabilities  are,  and  where  the  threats 
would be across the country. 

So obviously as we move toward that, the closer we move to that, 
the  more  ability  we  will  have  to  apply  some  of  the  tools.  And  they 
are,  you  know,  pretty  sophisticated  tools  that  we  are  now  devel-
oping that will allow us to identify where the consequences are the 
greatest, and use some of our intelligence to see where the threats 
and the vulnerabilities are. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

So the more we can encourage that move, I think the happier we 

are going to be. 

Senator KERRY. Well, I think it is important. 
Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator Lautenberg. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Thanks, Mr. Chairman. 
Mr.  Secretary,  the  obvious  lesson  that  came  out  of  the  London 
bombings was to use technology effectively, wherever it is available 
and the pictures that were taken. 

And  I  assume  that  as  you  look  to  streamline  the  functioning  of 
the  DHS  operation  that,  not  only  will  it  be  reassignment  of  per-
sonnel,  or  the  redefinition  of  their  responsibilities,  but  also  the 
greatest employment of technology that we can get. 

And  I  ask  you  this.  Is  DHS  totally  kept  up-to-date  on  develop-
ments  within  the  military  because  there  are  weapons,  detection 
systems that we know at Fort Mammoth that they have developed 
a technique for interrupting a signal from a remote to a detonator, 
and things of that nature, also to deter the course of a heat-seeking 
missile with radar. 

And all of those things help to make us safer. But I wonder, does 
your  department  get  constantly  kept  up-to-date  on  these  develop-
ments,  even  if  they  are  not  finished  products  to  help  you  in  your 
planning? 

Mr.  CHERTOFF.  We  do  work  with  the  Department  of  Defense  on 
a  whole  range  of  issues  including  detection  equipment,  various 
kinds of countermeasure equipment to see what, in fact, technology 
that is developed and can be applicable here at home. 

And,  in  fact,  that  is  something  we  want  to  do  more  of,  not  only 
with  respect  to  technology,  but  with  respect  to  planning  capabili-
ties. 

I  have  asked  the  Defense  Department,  and  Secretary  Rumsfeld 
has  agreed  to  give  us  some  assistance,  in  terms  of  people  who  can 
bring  to  our  planning  department  the  kind  of  capabilities  the  De-
fense  Department  has  in  integrating  a  large  plan  to  react,  need  to 
be prepared to react to a potential emergency. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Do  we  have  a  fairly  easy  swap  of  intel-
ligence  information  with  our  friends  around  the  world?  What  kind 
of channels do we use in terms of advanced knowledge of what they 
are  seeing  in  their  own  countries,  because  I  wonder  whether— 
would  it  make  sense,  or  is  it  effectively  being  done  now  that  there 
is a central anti-terrorist intelligence program, and whether or not 
it  is  possible  to  form  an  alliance,  a  functioning  alliance  that  says, 
look,  we  are  all  worried  about  the  same  problems?  I  do  not  think 
there is any country that feels exempt from the threat. 

And  I  wonder  whether  it  would  not  be  a  good  idea,  if  unless  the 
information  flow  is  as  we  would  like  to  see  it,  to  have  a  central 
agency  composed  of  all  of  the  democratic  societies  who  are  con-
cerned  about  this,  so  that  there  is  easy  access  for  all  countries  on 
anything related to terrorist activity that they see. 

Mr. CHERTOFF. Well, you know, we do work very closely with our 
allies, and we work both through intelligence channels and law en-
forcement channels. 

And  just  drawing  back  on  my  experience  when  I  was  at  the  De-
partment  of  Justice,  we  had  very  close  working  relationships  with 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

a  lot  of  countries  in  terms  of  some  of  what  they  were  doing  with 
counter-terrorism, and I think we are continuing to build on those. 
Among  the  things  we  are  talking  to  our  friends  about,  are  ways 
to  better  exchange  data—fingerprint  data—information  about  peo-
ple  that  are  turned  away  at  one  border  that  might  present  them-
selves at another border. 

And, in fact, we are talking to some of our allies right now about 
ways to enhance that—well, I guess the jargon term is connectivity, 
giving people an ability to get some connection into our databases, 
obviously not unrestricted, but to look for, for example, people that 
have  been  turned  away,  because  there  are  risks,  from  the  United 
States.  And  if  they  want  to  go  to  England,  or  they  want  to  go  to 
another  country  overseas  to  make  sure  that  that  person’s,  let  us 
say,  fingerprints  or  name  can  be  run  against  some  of  our  data-
bases. 

I think you are quite right. I mean, the terrorists are constantly 
probing for seams between the democratic and freedom-loving soci-
eties,  and  we  want  to  make  sure  we  do  not  let  them  exploit  that. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Mr.  Secretary,  since  we  passed  legislation 
in the Senate that reduces the amount of grant money to the areas 
of highest risk to 60 percent, if that becomes law, will those restric-
tions  harm  your  efficiency  or  your  capacity  to  attack  the  problems 
that we are so concerned about? 

Mr.  CHERTOFF.  Well,  of  course,  Senator,  we  do  not  yet  know 
what the final formula for the appropriations will be or the precise 
final language. 

As  I  have  said,  we  believe  that  a  formula  that  is  risk-based  in 
terms  of  all  of  our  activities,  including  grant  funding,  gives  us  the 
highest ability to use our analytical tools to make sure that we are 
spending our resources wisely. 

Obviously,  we  will  work  within  whatever  constraints  Congress 
ultimately  sets  in  terms  of  the  appropriations,  and  within  those 
constraints,  we  will  continue  to  drive  as  much  as  possible  toward 
a risk-based approach to what we do. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Because  there  was  a  letter  that  you  sent 
out, I think it was last week sometime, asking that we commit the 
funds,  as  up  to  90  percent,  directed  to  areas  of  highest  risk.  And 
that  makes  sense,  I  think,  to  everybody.  And,  yet,  we  are  fighting 
a battle here. 

And  I  am  looking  for  your  help  on  this,  because  we  need  to  be 
sure  that  it  is  clearly  understood  that  the  place  that  we  ought  to 
apply  our  resources  is  to  the  areas  of  highest  risk.  And  it  is  very 
hard to do something like that through here, as you know. 

But  we  encourage  you  to  continue  sounding  that  message,  and 
also,  Mr.  Secretary,  to  continue  the  assignment  that  you  have 
taken  on  to  refine  the  functioning  of  the  Department  of  Homeland 
Security. 

The  question  was  asked,  Mr.  Chairman,  about  why  it  has  taken 
so  long.  My  gosh.  This  is  probably  the  biggest  change  in  govern-
ment  structure  in  the  United  States  in  the  last  50  or  more  years. 
And  we  are  grateful  that  you  have  taken  on  the  assignment,  and 
we  encourage  you  to  keep  working  on  it.  Thanks,  Mr.  Chairman. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Senator Snowe. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

STATEMENT OF HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MAINE 

retary. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Welcome,  Mr.  Sec-

The  area  I  would  like  to  probe  today  is  maritime  security.  I 
Chair the Coast Guard Subcommittee on this committee. And I am 
deeply  concerned  about  maritime  security,  and  our  ability  to  re-
spond  to  those  enormous  challenges  that  represent  a  tremendous 
threat to our homeland security. 

I  think  it  is  important  to  ensure  that  the  Coast  Guard  gets  the 
tools  that  are  necessary  to  respond  to  those  challenges.  I  think  it 
is  important  that  we  implement  the  ‘‘Maritime  Transportation  Se-
curity Act’’ with respect to providing the necessary funds to imple-
ment the port plan. 

I  think  it  is  also  important  that  we  expedite  the  Transportation 
Worker Identification Program so that we can identify the workers 
in  the  manifest  and  the  cargo  that  is  contained  in  ships  coming 
into our ports. 

And, frankly, I think we have been woefully inadequate in imple-
menting  those  programs  and  expediting  the  targeted  goals  cur-
rently in law. 

So,  I  would  like  to  have  you  address  some  of  those  issues  here 

this morning and what your views are. 

In  addition,  I  was  also  deeply  concerned  about  the  fact  that  re-
cently  during  the  course  of  our  hearing  with  respect  to  the  Coast 
Guard,  we  received  a  revised  implementation  plan  for  the  Deep 
Water,  a  recapitalization  program  for  the  Coast  Guard  assets  and 
the ships and their planes. 

Frankly,  the  idea  of  requiring  our  men  and  women  to  serve  on 
some  of  these  ships,  and  to  face  the  compelling  challenges  they  do 
day-in  and  day-out,  and  now  to  have  a  revised  plan  that  is  sug-
gesting  that  we  need  fewer  assets  than  we  were  requesting  in  the 
pre-9/11  environment.  There  are  fewer  assets  now  being  requested 
in  this  revised  implementation  plan  in  the  post-9/11  event.  And 
also  the  tremendous  challenges  that  we  are  now  facing,  it  is  hard 
to believe we need fewer assets. 

And,  frankly,  the  idea  of,  you  know,  extending  the  recapitaliza-
tion  program  of  these  planes  and  these  ships  for  20  to  25  years,  I 
have proposed accelerating the time table for buying new ships and 
planes  into  a  ten  to  fifteen  year  time  table.  Frankly,  we  could  do 
that and save money. 

But at the very least to target the cutters, whether it is the fast 
response,  the  national  security  cutters,  and  also  the  off-shore  cut-
ters in a more expeditious time table of ten to fifteen years. 

I mean, the Coast Guard, and the men and women who serve in 
the  Coast  Guard,  desperately  need  to  have  new  assets  without 
question.  I  mean,  we  now  rank  40th  of  42nd  world’s  oldest  naval 
fleet.  You  know,  we  are  next  to  the  Philippines  and  Mexico.  I 
mean, we are in dire straits. 

I cannot imagine why we would suggest extending this time table 
to  20  and  25  years.  It  simply  does  not  make  sense,  certainly  from 
national  security,  for  putting  our  men  and  women  in  harm’s  way, 
and  asking  them  to  go  out  to  sea,  you  know,  in  these,  you  know, 
rusting assets. It is more than we should ever expect. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

So  I  would  like  to  have  some  of  your  views  on  this  with  respect 

to maritime security and some of the issues that I have raised. 

Mr.  CHERTOFF.  Well,  Senator,  I  think  I  observed  in  my  remarks 
last  week,  we  view  the  whole  issue  of  maritime  security  and  ma-
rine  cargo  as  a  big  priority  for  us.  And  that  means  looking  at  the 
entire  maritime  cargo  system,  including  the  security  of  the  ports 
themselves,  but  also  our  ability  to  assure  that  the  cargo  that  is 
coming in in containers, is cargo as to which we have either a reli-
able  sense  that  we  know  what  is  in  the  cargo,  or  we  have  the  in-
spection tools necessary to tell us what is in the cargo. 

That  involves  not  only  continuing  to  do  what  we  are  doing  now, 
which means rolling out more inspection machines and radiological 
detection  machines,  it  also  means  continuing  to  work  with  our 
partners overseas in making sure that we are pushing back inspec-
tions and screening at the port of embarkation, not when the cargo 
actually arrives. 

And ultimately what we really want to do is, again, break a little 
bit  out  of  the  box  by  going  to  the  private  sector,  which  really  has 
a very capable and sophisticated machinery for keeping track of its 
cargo  and  its  supply  chain,  and  building  upon  that  capability  to 
give  us  an  earlier  look  at  the  history  of  cargo  before  it  comes  into 
the final container. 

One  of  the  things  I  wanted  to  do  when  we  had  the  incident,  for 
example,  right  after  I  arrived,  about  illegals  hiding  in  a  container, 
was  to  try  to  understand  how  that  could  happen  if  we  were  doing 
some inspection overseas. And the answer was that at some earlier 
point in the chain, that particular container had been loaded on the 
ship, so it had not come through that last port of embarkation. 

So  we  need  to  build  a  system  that  works  better.  But  I  think  I 
take  a  back  seat  to  nobody,  in  terms  of  my  recognition  that  the 
danger  to  our  ports  is  one  of  the  highest  consequence  dangers  we 
face, and we need to find a way to continue to elevate our defenses, 
but make sure we do not compromise the ability of our ports to op-
erate. 

And that is why when people say, well, you should inspect a hun-
dred percent of the cargo, we all know that that would be the death 
of the port, because you could not move anything through. 

As  far  as  the  port  is  concerned,  the  Coast  Guard  does  superb 
service,  did  superb  service  before  9/11  and  does  even  more  superb 
service since 9/11. And I have sat down with the Commandant, and 
other  top  leaders  of  the  Coast  Guard  and  said  to  them,  ‘‘look,  we 
need to make sure in putting our plan forward which includes, not 
only  capitalization  of  new  assets,  but  reengineering  and  refitting 
existing assets to fill the gaps that while we may be tightening the 
belt,  we  are  not  tightening  the  belt  to  the  point  that  we  are  actu-
ally cutting off our circulation.’’ 

In other words, the plan that we put forward is one that they as-
sure  me,  and  I  am  confident,  allows  us  to  perform  the  enhanced 
mission that Coast Guard has, without putting our brave men and 
women  at  risk,  or  compromising  our  ability  to  even  carry  out  the 
traditional legacy missions. 

Now, in a world with unlimited resources, which is not the world 
in  which  we  live  in,  one  might  say  let  us  accelerate  this.  But  any-
one,  you  know,  sitting  in  this  hearing  understands  we  are  also 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

dealing with issues of border security which demand resources, po-
tential  weapons  of  mass  effect  which  require  a  significant  invest-
ment  of  technology,  concerns  we  have  about  our  mass  transit  and 
our aviation security. 

So  we  have  to  build  plans  that  are  adequate  and  do  the  job,  but 
recognize  that  we  have  to  make  sure  that  we  cover  the  entirety  of 
the  job  and  that  we  do  not—in  order  to  make  sure  that  as  we  are 
enhancing  resources  in  one  area  that  we  do  not  cripple  ourselves 
in another. 

Senator  SNOWE.  I  just  think  I  would  like  to  work  with  you  on 
this  question,  because  I  do  believe  that  we  have  to  come  up  with 
a  much  different  response  for  the  Coast  Guard  and  in  these  rein-
vestments. They desperately need to have new ships. 

And,  you  know,  OMB  is  obviously  where  this  is  coming  from. 
And  I  know  you  do  not  have  to  comment  on  that.  But  I  do  believe 
we have to do something much differently. 

And I plan to look at, and hopefully working with the Chairman 
of  this  committee,  to  look  at  a  revision,  at  least  a  more  targeted 
recapitalization,  you  know,  of  ships  so  that  at  least  we  can  get 
these  ships  online  sooner,  because  the  missions  they  are  required 
to  implement,  I  mean,  talking  about  maritime  domain  awareness, 
they clearly need to have these ships sooner than later. 

And,  frankly,  it  will  be  a  much  greater  savings  in  all  respects 
rather than now using our legacy assets as part of the Deep Water 
solution.  It  simply  does  not  make  sense  in  all  areas.  So  I  hope  we 
can work together on that. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Mr.  CHERTOFF.  I  look  forward  to  doing  that,  and  also  to  see  if 
there  are  ways  we  can  make  the  building  of  these  vessels  cheaper 
and quicker. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Mr.  Secretary,  it  has  been  my  policy  as  the 
Chairman  to  ask  questions  last,  so  I  want  to  get  down  to,  sort  of, 
the guts of this thing. It is a reorganization, and I have been going 
over the organization chart. 

As  I  understand  it,  we  end  up  with  a  secretary,  a  deputy  sec-
retary,  four  under  secretaries,  a  chief  of  staff,  executive  secretary, 
military liaison, three assistant secretaries, fourteen directors, and 
several boards. 

[The information referred to follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.

1
T
R
A
H
C
9
1
7

33 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.

2
T
R
A
H
C
9
1
7

34 

Well,  how  does  this  change  the  employment  level  of  the  Depart-

ment? 

Mr. CHERTOFF. Well, I think it is neutral with respect to the peo-
ple  who  are  on  the  line.  It  trims  out  a  number  of  supervisors.  It 
flattens  the  organization  to  some  extent.  We  actually  wind  up 
eliminating  the  number  of  direct  reports  and  the  operating  compo-
nents  which  I  think  are  where  most  of  our  people  are.  Actually,  it 
flattens the distance between them and the top management of the 
department  by  eliminating  a  layer  of  appointees  between  the  com-
ponents and the top management. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  But  I  remember  when  the  Department  of  De-
fense  was  organized,  it  was  supposed  to  bring  about  efficiency  and 
everything  in  terms  of  the  new  directorate  capability.  We  had  a 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.

3
T
R
A
H
C
9
1
7

35 

whole  series  of  secretaries,  under  secretaries  and  assistant  secre-
taries. And then we still had the same organization for all the serv-
ices below that. 

Have  you  not  achieved  the  same  thing?  It  seems  to  me  you  are 

sort of top heavy. 

Mr.  CHERTOFF.  Actually,  we  have  actually  reduced  the  amount 
of, I guess, what we would call above the water line. And what we 
have  done  is,  we  have  flattened  the  management  piece  so  that 
there  are  no  additional  layers  of  review,  but  we  have  built  in,  I 
think, greater accountability. 

What we have tried to do is say, look, when we have a particular 
mission  to  accomplish,  we  want  to  make  sure  there  is  one  person 
and  one  office  that  has  the  span  of  control,  and  the  accountability 
to make sure that mission gets performed. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  But  you  have  transportation  security,  customs 
and  border  protection,  Secret  Service,  director  of  citizenship  and 
immigration,  commissioner  of  immigration  and  custom  enforce-
ment, director at FEMA, and the commandant of the Coast Guard. 
Now, that is your operational level. 

Mr. CHERTOFF. That is right. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  No  change  in  that  by  this  reorganization.  Those 
are  entities  that  were  folded  into  the  department.  But  you  have  a 
new  under  secretary  for  management,  a  new  under  secretary  for 
policy,  a  new  under  secretary  for  preparedness,  and  a  new  assist-
ant  secretary  for  Congressional  and  intergovernmental  affairs,  a 
new  assistant  secretary  for  public  affairs,  a  new  chief  intelligence 
officer,  and  the  assistant  secretary  for  office  of  intelligence  anal-
ysis,  a  new  director  of  operations  and  coordination,  and  a  new 
screening coordination office. 

Now, that is sort of a bundle of new people. 
Mr. CHERTOFF. Actually, I am happy to—maybe it will help a lit-
tle bit if I indicate a lot of these actually existed and we have elimi-
nated a lot of posts that existed. There has been currently and was 
in the beginning an under secretary for management. There was an 
under secretary for science and technology. That continues. 

The  under  secretary  for  preparedness  essentially  replaces  or  re-
titles  what  was  an  under  secretary  for  infrastructure  protection 
and  information  analysis.  While  we  have  had  an  assistant  sec-
retary for legislative affairs, we are simply putting a little bit more 
into  that  person’s  responsibility  and  we  have  had  all  these  other 
positions,  some  of  which  have  been,  frankly,  mandated  by  Con-
gress. 

So,  I  think  that  we  are  actually  reducing  the  number  of  under 

secretaries and people in that kind of upper-middle level. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I  am  reminded  of  my  old  friend  that  was  Chair-
man  of  this  committee  for  many  years,  Senator  Magness,  and  he 
used to say that the busiest man downtown is the sign painter. 

Mr. CHERTOFF. I think that is probably right. 
The CHAIRMAN. The second busiest is the one with the carpet, be-
cause  if  you  go  up  high  enough,  you  get  a  carpet  on  the  floor.  You 
remember? 

Now,  what  have  you  done  here  in  terms  of  this?  You  have  your-
self  and  your  deputy  and  chief  of  staff,  executive  secretary,  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

who—— 

military liaison on your organization chart right up here. Those are 
the people you meet with, right? 

Mr. CHERTOFF. Well, actually, no. The people that I meet with— 
I  mean,  I  meet  with  them—are  the  operating  component  heads.  I 
mean, I am very much a believer that you, if you—— 

Mr. CHERTOFF. That is the bottom line, right? 
Mr.  CHERTOFF.  Right,  the  bottom  line  there.  Those  are  the  folks 

The CHAIRMAN. Who coordinates all this middle group? 
Mr.  CHERTOFF.  Well,  some  of  the  middle  group  here  is  pretty 
thin  and  pretty  small.  I  mean,  the  military  liaison  is  really  a  few 
people  and  they  essentially  help  us  deal  with  the  Defense  Depart-
ment.  The  Assistant  Secretary  of  Congressional  and  Intergovern-
mental Affairs should be dealing with—— 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Pardon  me.  But  you  do  have  four  under  secre-

taries—— 

Mr. CHERTOFF. Right. 
The  CHAIRMAN.—but  only  three  assistant  secretaries.  That  is 

sort of reverse of the normal government process. 

Mr.  CHERTOFF.  Actually,  what  happened  is  all  these  folks  at  the 
bottom  are  people  who  used  to  be  assistant  secretaries.  And  we 
have essentially retitled them. Again, to make it clear—— 

The  CHAIRMAN.  But  none  of  them  on  your  chart,  none  of  them 
show any interaction with this group in the middle, with the oper-
ational  people.  These  are  all  advisors  to  you,  right?  They  are  not 
subject  to  the  control  of  the  under  secretaries  at  all,  at  least  if  I 
understand how to read these charts. 

Mr.  CHERTOFF.  The  charts  are  probably  a  little  bit  more  simple 
than,  you  know,  perhaps  they  should  be.  Basically  we  divide  the 
components  into  two  pieces.  There  are  the  operating  components 
that basically own most of the assets and have most of the people. 
And those are along the bottom. 

Then  we  have  various  components  that  perform  functions  that 
you  would  in  some  ways  consider  staff  functions.  They  service  the 
whole  department  as  a  whole.  That  has  to  do  with  management. 
That allows us to unify our procurement, our management, and our 
financial operations across the whole department. 

General  counsel,  which  makes  sure  all  the  legal  stuff  is  coordi-
nated;  Congressional  affairs,  which  coordinates  all  the  legislative 
affairs;  and  then  you  have  some  under  secretaries  that  perform 
again a function that tends to span the entire department. 

Science and technology gives us the backbone, the research back-
bone  that  supports  all  the  operating  components  as  well  as  State 
and local government and things like that. 

Policy,  again,  it  is  a  function  that  is  a  staff  function.  It  helps  us 
drive policy and planning for the whole department. It is not some-
thing that people report through. 

And preparedness, again, is a somewhat unique position because 
it reflects an unusual mission we have in the department which is 
with  respect  to  a  lot  of  preparedness.  We  do  not  own  the  assets  or 
employ  the  people.  It  is  the  State  and  local  government  and  the 
private sector that does. We have to network that. And we need to 
have  one  person  who  is  responsible  for  managing  that  network  for 
the department. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

So all these under secretaries essentially are operating across the 
department.  They  are  dealing  with  the  components  for  expertise 
and  for  coordination,  but  they  do  not  own  most  of  the  people,  and 
they do not own most of the stuff. 

Most of the people and most of the assets are controlled or owned 
by the individual components. I mean, although pictorially they are 
at the bottom, it does not really represent their importance. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Senator  Lautenberg  has  a  question,  and  then  I 

am going to ask you my last question. 

Go ahead. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
It is kind of mystifying when you say, Mr. Secretary, that a hun-
dred  percent  of  the  cargo  coming  in  is  screened.  And  it  is  a  little 
confusing. 

Are  we  talking  about  looking  at  manifests?  And  what  do  we  do 
about  those  ports  where  the  screening  operation  is  done,  kind  of, 
considerably ahead of the time for shipment? 

Mr. CHERTOFF. I think screening, as you pointed out, does not in-
volve  actual  physical  inspection.  What  it  does  do  is,  it  takes  infor-
mation  from  the  manifest,  what  we  know  about  the  ship  or  what 
we know about the port and other information, and based upon an 
algorithm  or  an  analysis  that  includes  intelligence  that  we  gather 
rates  them  in  terms  of  their  risk  and  whether  we  believe  it  is, 
based  on  any  number  of  these  characteristics,  we  think  it  is  risky 
cargo or not risky cargo. 

And  then  there  is,  of  course,  a  range  in  the  middle  where  there 
is  some  judgment  that  is  exercised  based  on  some  additional  gath-
ering of facts. 

So  what  we  do  is,  we  target  those  elements  of  cargo  that  based 
on all of these considerations, are those that we have some serious 
question  about.  And  those  do  get  inspected.  They  get  inspected  ei-
ther  nonintrusively  or  even  sometimes  by  breaking  into  the  cargo. 
So  although  the  manifest  and  the  information  is  one  element  of 
this,  it  is  not  the  only  element.  There  are  other  elements  as  well. 
Part  of  what  we  try  to  build  into  this  is  a,  kind  of,  registered 
cargo  program,  where  certain  companies  do  have  arrangements 
where  if  they  put  into  place  some  protective  measures,  that  essen-
tially  gives  them  a  higher  reliability  score  in  terms  of  what  we  in-
spect. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thanks, Mr. Chairman. 
Mr.  Secretary,  I  want  you  to  know  that  included  in  the  bill  now 
under port security is a risk assessment, the basis for distribution. 
I  hope  that  we  will  be  able  to  do  that  in  other  programs  as  well. 

Thanks, Mr. Chairman, for your patience. 
The CHAIRMAN. Mr. Secretary, my last comment is this. We have 
jurisdiction  over  all  forms  of  these  containers,  surface,  transpor-
tation, ocean, and road, and air. We have got to get a hold on this 
container thing. 

I would like to suggest that we arrange a meeting with your peo-
ple  and  just  take  the  whole  gang  of  this  committee  down  to  your 
department,  and  have  some  sort  of  briefing  of  how  you  are  han-
dling this problem, where are the problems, because I think we do 
not have time for everyone to ask the questions. We are much bet-
ter off if we just got a little bit of a lecture from your people. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

Last,  the  bottom  line.  How  much  does  this  increase  the  cost  of 

doing business for homeland security? 

Mr.  CHERTOFF.  The  reorganization  is  neutral  as  to  cost.  What  it 
does do is it will hopefully save us, actually save us money and cer-
tainly  aggravation,  in  making  sure  we  are  able  to  do  what  I  think 
the  public  and  Congress  expected  us  to  do  when  they  set  it  up 
which  is  running  one  department  which  is  focused  on  bringing  all 
the tools together to accomplish the very important things we have 
to accomplish. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Well,  I  admire  what  you  are  doing,  but  some  of 
us  are  on  both  this  committee  and  the  Appropriations  Committee. 
And this is the department that is ever increasing its costs. I hope 
you are right. 

Thank you very much. 
Mr. CHERTOFF. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
[Whereupon, at 12:37 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:18 Mar 17, 2011 Jkt 065180 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\65180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

